

U3O8 Corp. Announces Results of Shareholder Meeting and Warrant Cancellation - MarketWatch



























































Latest News










Dow

21,830
+33.76
+0.15%






Nasdaq

6,375
-7.51
-0.12%






S&P 500

2,472
-3.32
-0.13%









9:15 P.M. ET


Updated
      Wall Street isn’t ready for a 1,100-point tumble in the Dow industrials
                                





 
7:38 P.M. ET


                                  Barron's Buzz: Robo 2.0, Facebook and Twitter, Trading On News
                                





 
7:28 P.M. ET


                                  A Wild Week in Washington 
                                





 
6:32 P.M. ET


Updated
      The dark side of cruises
                                





 
6:31 P.M. ET


                                   Trump to Police: 'Don't Be Too Nice'
                                





 
6:31 P.M. ET


Updated
      The highest paid athletes in the world, in one chart
                                





 
6:31 P.M. ET


Updated
      O.J. Simpson made over $400,000 while in prison and won’t have to give any of it to the Goldman family
                                





 
6:30 P.M. ET


Updated
      Here are 10 co-workers you should avoid like the plague — especially in meetings
                                





 
6:29 P.M. ET


Updated
      Top 10 most annoying people you may want to unfriend on Facebook 
                                





 
6:28 P.M. ET


Updated
      This is one person you should never unfriend on Facebook...
                                





 
6:28 P.M. ET


Updated
      3 horrible ways typos could alter the course of your life
                                





 
6:27 P.M. ET


Updated
      Paint your bathroom this color and boost your home’s selling price by $5,400
                                





 
6:27 P.M. ET


Updated
      Americans’ new badge of honor: ‘I was blocked by a celebrity!’
                                





 
6:26 P.M. ET


Updated
      5 weird things I found out about America in my first 24 hours 
                                





 
6:14 P.M. ET


Updated
      Beyond Tesla: 7 stocks driving the autonomous car revolution
                                





 
6:13 P.M. ET


Updated
      These 7 highly taxed companies need Congress to finally act on tax reform
                                





 
6:11 P.M. ET


Updated
      Watch out: ‘Kids’ are making the most money in this stock market 
                                





 
6:09 P.M. ET


Updated
      7 real ways for millennials to save money (not by brownbagging and skipping Starbucks)
                                





 
6:09 P.M. ET


Updated
      ‘Game of Thrones’: This computer model predicts who will be killed off — or survive
                                





 
6:08 P.M. ET


Updated
      This basic balanced index fund is beating the hedge fund averages
                                





 








































Log In
























Home






CNW Group




Get email alerts



         U3O8 Corp. Announces Results of Shareholder Meeting and Warrant Cancellation
    








    By

Published: June 23, 2017 9:00 a.m. ET

Share






















































 



 















TORONTO, Jun 23, 2017 (Canada NewsWire via COMTEX) -- U3O8 Corp. (UWE), (otcqb:UWEFF) ("U3O8 Corp." or the "Company") reports that all matters brought before its shareholders were approved at the Annual & Special Meeting ("ASM") held yesterday in Toronto, Ontario. A total of 121,790,106 of the Corporation's common shares were voted, representing 35% of its issued and outstanding stock. In addition, 19.3 million warrants expired and 2.85 million warrants were exercised for gross proceeds of $99,750, which together reduce the number of outstanding warrants by approximately 18%.  Warrant Exercise & Expiry  In the press release dated June 7(th), 2017, U3O8 Corp. reported that a shareholder had offered to have 19.3 million warrants accelerated at a strike price of over double the current share price. The warrant acceleration term ended at midnight last night, at which time the warrants had not been exercised, and have therefore been cancelled. "The shareholder who made this offer did so in the broader interest of other shareholders in helping the Company achieve a leaner capital structure. I would also like to thank the shareholders who voted, providing a clear mandate to the Board," said Richard Spencer, U3O8 Corp.'s President and CEO.  In addition, Dr. Keith Barron, a director of the Corporation, exercised 2.85 million out-of-the-money warrants for gross proceeds of $99,750 in order to provide the Company with working capital without diluting other shareholders.  Key matters approved at the ASM include:  Consolidation and Deconsolidation of the Corporation's Stock ("Consolidation-Deconsolidation")  The goal of the Consolidation-Deconsolidation is to provide a cost-effective method of paying out, for the value of shares held, accounts of less than 1,000 U3O8 Corp. shares. Most accounts that hold less than 1,000 shares are inactive and removal of these accounts from the shareholder register would result in significant administrative cost savings.  The Company will be offering a simple and cost-effective way for shareholders, irrespective of account size, to purchase additional shares of the Company prior to the Consolidation-Deconsolidation coming into effect. The additional shares will be made available within the next few business days via an "Existing Shareholder Prospectus Exemption" ("ESPE") - and shareholders will have a two- to three-week window in which to participate. General information on the ESPE is available on the Company's homepage at http://www.u3o8corp.com and specific terms of the financing will be press released shortly.  The Consolidation-Deconsolidation was approved by 96% of the shares voted, with 4% against.  Share Consolidation ("Consolidation")  Shareholders approved the proposal to undertake a Consolidation of 20 current U3O8 Corp. shares to one new (post-Consolidation) share. The aim of the Consolidation is to meet the metrics required for larger funds to invest in the stock alongside the Company's current shareholder base. The result of the shareholder ballot was 86% of shares voted in favour and 14% against. The Board intends to undertake the Consolidation after the Consildation-Deconsolidation, described above, has been completed.  Directors  Shareholders voted for the slate of directors proposed by Management as follows:   Director % Votes For % Votes Abstained -------- ----------- ----------------- Keith Barron 98% 2% ------------ --- --- David Constable 98% 2% --------------- --- --- David Franklin 98% 2% -------------- --- --- Pablo Marcet 98% 2% ------------ --- --- David Marsh 98% 2% ----------- --- --- Richard Spencer 98% 2% --------------- --- ---  U3O8 Corp.'s Chairman, Mr David Constable, commented: "I would like to formally thank Darin Milmeister who offered not to stand for re-election as a director, so as to allow David Marsh to be nominated without increasing the size of the board. Darin provided sage advice and counsel during his term on the board, for which I thank him. I welcome David Marsh to the board and look forward to working with him".  Auditors  98% of shares were voted in favour of the appointment of Davidson and Company LLP to be the Company's auditors for 2017.  About U3O8 Corp.  U3O8 Corp. is focused on exploration and development of deposits of uranium and associated commodities in South America. Potential by-products from uranium production include commodities used in the energy storage industry - in the manufacture of batteries - such as nickel, vanadium and phosphate. The Company's mineral resources estimates were made in accordance with National Instrument 43-101, and are contained in three deposits:   -- Laguna Salada Deposit, Argentina - a PEA shows this near surface, free-digging uranium - vanadium deposit has low production-cost potential; -- Berlin Deposit, Colombia - a PEA shows that Berlin also has low-cost uranium production potential due to revenue that would be generated from by-products of phosphate, vanadium, nickel, rare earths (yttrium and neodymium) and other metals that occur within the deposit; and -- Kurupung Deposit, Guyana - a uranium resource has been estimated in four veins within a uranium-zirconium vein system. Resources have been estimated on four veins, while consistent mineralization of the same type has been intersected in scout drilling of an additional six veins, while yet other veins require first-time exploration drilling.  Information on U3O8 Corp., its resources and technical reports are available at www.u3o8corp.com and on SEDAR at www.sedar.com. Follow U3O8 Corp. on Facebook: www.facebook.com/u3o8corp, Twitter: www.twitter.com/u3o8corp and YouTube: www.youtube.com/u3o8corp.  Forward-Looking Statements  This news release includes certain "forward looking statements" related with the development plans, economic potential and growth targets of U3O8 Corp's projects. Forward-looking statements consist of statements that are not purely historical, including statements regarding beliefs, plans, expectations or intensions for the future, and include, but not limited to, statements with respect to: (a) the low-cost and near-term development of Laguna Salada, (b) the Laguna Salada and Berlin PEAs, (c) the potential of the Kurupung district in Guyana, (d) impact of the U- pgradeTM process on expected capital and operating expenditures, and (e) the price and market for uranium. These statements are based on assumptions, including that: (i) actual results of our exploration, resource goals, metallurgical testing, economic studies and development activities will continue to be positive and proceed as planned, and assumptions in the Laguna Salada and Berlin PEAs prove to be accurate, (ii) a joint venture will be formed with the provincial petroleum and mining company on the Argentina project, (iii) requisite regulatory and governmental approvals will be received on a timely basis on terms acceptable to U3O8 Corp., (iv) economic, political and industry market conditions will be favourable, and (v) financial markets and the market for uranium will improve for junior resource companies in the short-term. Such statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results, performance or developments to differ materially from those contained in such statements, including, but not limited to: (1) changes in general economic and financial market conditions, (2) changes in demand and prices for minerals, (3) the Company's ability to establish appropriate joint venture partnerships, (4) litigation, regulatory, and legislative developments, dependence on regulatory approvals, and changes in environmental compliance requirements, community support and the political and economic climate, (5) the inherent uncertainties and speculative nature associated with exploration results, resource estimates, potential resource growth, future metallurgical test results, changes in project parameters as plans evolve, (6) competitive developments, (7) availability of future financing, (8) exploration risks, and other factors beyond the control of U3O8 Corp. including those factors set out in the "Risk Factors" in our Annual Information Form available on SEDAR at www.sedar.com. Readers are cautioned that the assumptions used in the preparation of such information, although considered reasonable at the time of preparation, may prove to be imprecise and, as such, undue reliance should not be placed on forward-looking statements. U3O8 Corp. assumes no obligation to update such information, except as may be required by law. For more information on the above-noted PEAs, refer to the September 18, 2014 technical report titled "Preliminary Economic Assessment of the Laguna Salada Uranium-Vanadium Deposit, Chubut Province, Argentina" and the January 18, 2013 technical report titled "U3O8 Corp. Preliminary Economic Assessment on the Berlin Deposit, Colombia."  SOURCE U3O8 Corp.  View original content: http://www.newswire.ca/en/releases/archive/June2017/23/c2843.html SOURCE: U3O8 Corp.  Richard Spencer, President & CEO, U3O8 Corp. Tel.: (416) 868-1491 richard@u3o8corp.com  Copyright (C) 2017 CNW Group. All rights reserved. 


More from MarketWatch




















Most Popular





Wall Street isn’t ready for a 1,100-point tumble in the Dow industrials





All the companies in Jeff Bezos’s empire, in one (large) chart





S&P 500, Nasdaq finish lower after Amazon disappointment; Dow closes at record





Intel earnings have message for AMD and Nvidia: ‘Bring it on’





Silicon Valley's corporate-campus building boom is a cautionary tale




MarketWatch Partner Center




















 








            We Want to
            Hear from You


Join the conversation
Comment
















Sponsored Headlines













Advanced Search







Stocks



Columns


Authors


Topics







No results found







































 






















Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft












MarketWatch.com Topics

























Bulletin






Investor Alert





















Topics







		Istanbul



			Brexit




		Guns







		Millennials




		Immigration



			Apple

/conga/topics/main.html
369880



Subjects in the news



U.S. Economy


U.S. Politics


Earnings


Sales


Aerospace


Ice




Markets


Production


Iraq


Russia


Oil


United Kingdom




Europe


European Markets


London Markets


Health Care


Income


Insurance






People in the news



Jones, Edward


Trump, Donald


Woods, Tiger


Buffett, Warren


Putnam, George


Clinton, Bill




Obama, Barack


Putin, Vladimir


Tillerson, Rex


Washington, George


Ryan, James


Walker, David




West, David


Williams, James


Gray, John


Clooney, George


Cruise, Tom


Jolie, Angelina






Companies in the news



Northrop Grumman Corp.


International Data Group


New York Mercantile Exchange


American International Group


Health Care Insurance


Miners




Metal Exchange


Target Corp.


United National


Performance


News Corp.


Jones




Oppenheimer


International Industries


Transport Service


Capital One Financial


Apple Inc.


eBay Inc.






Organizations in the news



American Petroleum Institute


European Union


OPEC


Education Department


Transportation Department


European Central Bank




Federal Reserve Bank of New York


Congress


Public Service Commission


Securities and Exchange Commission


Baseball


Nasdaq Stock Market




Consumers Union


World Bank


Council on Foreign Relations


Security Council


Senate


Boston College












Browse topics:


A


B


C


D


E


F


G


H


I


J


K


L


M


N


O


P


Q


R


S


T


U


V


W


X


Y


Z


0-9





















Log In




10:29 PM EDT
July 28, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Closed


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
9:16pWall Street isn’t ready for a 1,100-point tumble in the Dow industrials
7:39pBarron's Buzz: Robo 2.0, Facebook and Twitter, Trading On News
7:29pA Wild Week in Washington 
6:32pThe dark side of cruises
6:32pThe highest paid athletes in the world, in one chart
6:31pO.J. Simpson made over $400,000 while in prison and won’t have to give any of it to the Goldman family
6:31p Trump to Police: 'Don't Be Too Nice'
6:31pHere are 10 co-workers you should avoid like the plague — especially in meetings
6:29pTop 10 most annoying people you may want to unfriend on Facebook 
6:29pThis is one person you should never unfriend on Facebook...
6:29p3 horrible ways typos could alter the course of your life
6:27pPaint your bathroom this color and boost your home’s selling price by $5,400
6:27pAmericans’ new badge of honor: ‘I was blocked by a celebrity!’
6:27p5 weird things I found out about America in my first 24 hours 
6:14pBeyond Tesla: 7 stocks driving the autonomous car revolution
6:14pThese 7 highly taxed companies need Congress to finally act on tax reform
6:11pWatch out: ‘Kids’ are making the most money in this stock market 
6:10p7 real ways for millennials to save money (not by brownbagging and skipping Starbucks)
6:09p‘Game of Thrones’: This computer model predicts who will be killed off — or survive
6:09pThis basic balanced index fund is beating the hedge fund averages
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,830.31

+33.76
+0.15%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,374.68

-7.51
-0.12%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,472.10

-3.32
-0.13%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15






















































U3O8 Corp. Enhances its Battery Commodity Focus by Joining Vanitec - the Only Global Vanadium Organization - to Provide Access to Battery Research and Development - Junior Mining Network











































































			U3O8 Corp. Enhances its Battery Commodity Focus by Joining Vanitec - the Only Global Vanadium Organization - to Provide Access to Battery Research and Development		



                        Vanadium                    




TORONTO, Feb. 23, 2017 /CNW/ - U3O8 Corp. (TSX: UWE), (OTCQB: UWEFF) ("U3O8 Corp." or the "Company") announces that it has become an associate member of Vanitec Limited ("Vanitec"). Vanitec brings together research organizations and manufacturers of products that contain vanadium, with companies involved in the mining and processing of the metal. The use of vanadium in batteries is growing exponentially, not only for industrial-scale Vanadium Redox Flow Batteries ("VRB"), but also for lithium ion batteries. U3O8 Corp. also has phosphate and nickel resources – commodities that are in demand by the battery industry.
"One of the greatest challenges and opportunities related with renewable energy from solar or wind is its inherent supply variability that needs to be regulated or smoothed in order to be a useful source of electricity," said Dr Richard Spencer, President and CEO of U3O8 Corp.  "Batteries perform this function, acting like shock-absorbers, storing energy when an excess is produced, and delivering electricity when demand rises.  Lithium-ion batteries are ideal for high power output for a few hours, but when power is needed for longer periods, other technologies, such as flow batteries, provide a better alternative.  Vanadium Redox Flow Batteries are a superior alternative when power is needed for more than four hours – and these batteries can easily and cost-effectively be scaled up for industrial applications.  With its vanadium resources of 63 million pounds indicated and 118 million pounds inferred, U3O8 Corp. represents a potential supplier to the battery industry.  Vanitec provides a forum in which we may forge closer ties with battery manufacturers as well as research facilities that are working on ways of making the batteries more efficient and cost-effective.  This is an exciting time since, after years of weakening markets, the vanadium price has rebounded sharply in response to increased demand."
U3O8 Corp.'s Vanadium Resources
U3O8 Corp. has a significant vanadium resource of 63 million pounds indicated and 118 million pounds inferred in its Berlin and Laguna Salada deposits.  Vanadium would potentially be produced as a by-product in both deposits, constituting approximately 14% of revenue from the Laguna Salada Deposit1 and approximately 9% from Berlin2.  At Laguna Salada, the removal of pebbles by screening results in the uranium and vanadium being concentrated into the fine-grained component of the mineralized gravel.  Test work has shown that beneficiation by screening results in vanadium grades increasing over four times in the fine-grained material compared with the gravel's in situ grade1.
Table 1.  Summary of U3O8 Corp.'s NI 43-101 vanadium resources (source: Preliminary Economic Assessments on the Berlin and Laguna Salada deposits3,4).





Vanadium Resources


Deposit
 NI 43-101 Resource Classification
Tonnes (million)
Grade V2O5 
Beneficiated Grade
Contained V2O5(Mlb)


Berlin, Colombia
Indicated
0.6
0.4%
-
6.0


Inferred
8.1
0.5%
-
91.0


 
 
 
 
 
 


Laguna Salada, Argentina
Indicated
47.3
0.06%
0.24%
57.1


Inferred
20.8
0.06%
0.24%
26.9





Vanadium in Batteries
Vanadium is used in flow batteries as well as some lithium ion types.
Flow Batteries:  
Vanadium Redox Flow Batteries ("VRBs") provide utility- or industrial– scale electrical storage capacity.  The battery consists essentially of two tanks of vanadium electrolyte separated by a membrane.  Its capacity to store energy can easily be scaled by increasing the size of the tanks.  Vanadium represents 35-40% of the cost of VRBs.
What really sets these batteries apart is that they can be charged and discharged over and over again without degradation or significant loss of capacity.  Large VRBs with a megawatt capacity have been through over 200,000 charge-discharge cycles, equivalent to over 250 years of operation assuming one charge-discharge cycle per day, with no significant degradation of the electrolyte.  The operating life of VRBs is considered to be around 20 years because of gradual degradation of the membrane; the actual vanadium electrolyte does not degrade and can be recycled into a new battery.  In contrast, most long-lived lithium ion batteries last up to 10,000 charge-discharge cycles – and have a maximum life of about seven years. 
As a result of the charged ions being in a liquid, VRBs charge in a very short time, and conversely, the stored energy can be released almost instantaneously when required.  VRBs also have excellent charge retention; they can be left for up to a year and still retain 98% of their charge.  New generation VRBs operate efficiently over a wide temperature range of -40°C to +50°C.  VRBs are also non-flammable.  
The energy capacity of current VRB models is relatively low (Figure 1).  This means that for a given amount of energy storage, a VRB will be significantly larger than a lithium ion battery. Ongoing development is focused on increasing the energy capacity of VRBs and the most recent work shows that the addition of phosphate to the electrolyte doubles its energy capacity. 
The up-front cost of a VRB is currently more than double that of a lithium ion battery system of similar energy storage capacity.  This is counterbalanced by two things:  longer battery life (20 years for a VRB versus 7 years for a lithium ion battery), and the fact that the VRB electrolyte can be reused indefinitely in new batteries.
Lithium Vanadium Phosphate Batteries:
Lithium vanadium phosphate ("LVP") batteries are attracting attention because of their higher energy capacity (their capacity to store a large amount of energy for their weight).  LVPs have an energy capacity almost double that of other mainstream lithium ion batteries (490Wh/kg versus 200Wh/kg for lithium cobalt oxide ("LCO") and 250Wh/kg for lithium nickel cobalt aluminium oxide ("NCA") batteries – Figure 1).  LVPs also have a slightly higher voltage (3.8V) in comparison to the 3.6V of the LCO and NCA batteries, which allows for faster acceleration in electric vehicles.  The greater thermal and electrochemical stability of phosphate also makes the batteries safer than many other types of lithium ion battery. 
Japan's GS Yuasa Corp., which has joint ventures with Mitsubishi and Honda, is manufacturing LVP batteries, as is Valence Technology Inc. in the USA.  BYD, a large Chinese battery manufacturer, is currently producing a lithium iron phosphate ("LFP") battery for the electric bus market that it's concentrating on, but is reported to be evaluating the LVP battery.  LVP is also the battery of choice for Subaru's G4e electric car. 
The growing attractiveness of phosphate in batteries is extremely interesting to U3O8 Corp. because of the phosphate resource in its Berlin Deposit in Colombia (Table 2).   Originally the Company had considered the phosphate in terms of the agricultural fertilizer market only, but the emergence of phosphate as a key component of batteries is driving the Company to focus more on the battery market, especially since the Berlin Deposit also contains a resource of nickel, another commodity used in some lithium ion batteries. 
Table 2.  U3O8 Corp.'s NI 43-101 phosphate and nickel resource in the Berlin Deposit4.





Other Battery Commodity Resources, Berlin Deposit


 NI 43-101 Resource Classification
Tonnes (million)
Phosphate
Nickel


Grade P2O5 
Contained P2O5(tonnes)
Grade Nickel
Contained Nickel (Mlbs)


Indicated
0.6
8.4%
50,000
0.2%
3.1


Inferred
8.1
9.4%
800,000
0.2%
42.1





Vanadium Market & Outlook
The vanadium market is predicted to slip into deficit later this year, with demand outstripping supply for the foreseeable future (Figure 2).  Prices have reacted by rising sharply after almost a decade of decline (Figure 3). 
Over 90% of current vanadium demand is from the steel industry, and is growing at a steady rate of 3%-4% per year.   Demand is driven by vanadium-steel having one of the highest strength to weight ratios of any steel alloy.  Adding only 2 pounds of vanadium to a tonne of steel doubles its strength, and rebar made from vanadium steel alloy is a key component to improving the resistance of buildings to earthquakes.
Demand for vanadium from the battery industry is starting to grow exponentially; batteries are expected to make up 25% of vanadium demand in 2020 from 6% in 2016 (Figure 2). 
Technical Information 
Dr. Richard Spencer, P.Geo., C.Geol., President and CEO of U3O8 Corp. and a Qualified Person as defined by National Instrument 43-101, has approved the technical information in this news release relating to the Laguna Salada Deposit and the related PEA.
About U3O8 Corp.
U3O8 Corp. is focused on exploration and development of deposits of uranium and associated commodities in South America.  Potential by-products from uranium production include commodities used in the energy storage industry – in the manufacture of batteries - such as nickel, vanadium and phosphate.  The Company's mineral resources estimates were made in accordance with National Instrument 43-101, and are contained in three deposits: 

Laguna Salada Deposit, Argentina – a PEA shows this near surface, free-digging uranium - vanadium deposit has low production-cost potential;
Berlin Deposit, Colombia – a PEA shows that Berlin also has low-cost uranium production potential due to revenue that would be generated from by-products of phosphate, vanadium, nickel, rare earths (yttrium and neodymium) and other metals that occur within the deposit; and
Kurupung Deposit, Guyana – a uranium resource has been estimated in four veins within a uranium-zirconium vein system. Resources have been estimated on four veins, while consistent mineralization of the same type has been intersected in scout drilling of an additional six veins, while yet other veins require first-time exploration drilling.

Information on U3O8 Corp., its resources and technical reports are available at www.u3o8corp.com and on SEDAR at www.sedar.com.  Follow U3O8 Corp. on Facebook:  www.facebook.com/u3o8corp, Twitter:  www.twitter.com/u3o8corp and Youtube: www.youtube.com/u3o8corp.


MORE MINING NEWS


Cordoba Minerals Receives Shareholder Approval for Transaction with High Power Exploration Inc.





Yamana Gold Produces 244,607 Ounces of Gold in Q2 2017





OceanaGold Reports Q2 2017 Results; Produces 124,396 Ounces of Gold





Eldorado Gold Reports Q2 2017 Results 





Endeavour Mining Increases Ity Project Mineral Resources to 3.8 Million Ounces of Gold





First Mining Finance Intersects 1.39 g/t Gold Over 202 Metres, Including 43.28 g/t Gold Over 2 Metres, at Goldlund Infill Drilling Program





Detour Gold Produces 150,138 Ounces of Gold in Q2 2017





Goldcorp Produces 635,000 Ounces of Gold in Q2 2017





Secova Metals Completes UAV-MAG Survey at Duvay/Chenier and Better Defines Drill Targets





Sandstorm Gold Provides Development and Exploration Updates on Royalty Assets





Excellon Resources Drills 2,318 g/t Silver Equivalent Over 6.76 Metres at Platosa Mine





Premier Gold Mines Provides McCoy-Cove Drilling and Pre-Development Program Update





GT Gold Drills New Discovery at Saddle South; Intercepts 13.03 g/t Au Over 10.67 Metres





NuLegacy Gold Discovers New Zone at Iceberg Deposit; Drills 85.4 Meters of 0.64 g/t Gold





Marathon Gold Drills 5.4 g/t Au Over 20.0 Meters at Valentine Lake Camp










GET DAILY NEWS FLOW



Sign Up To Receive MorningNews To Your Email Inbox 


  
 


















First Cobalt


First Cobalt is building a global portfolio of assets highly leveraged to the cobalt market. In Canada the Company has acquired the past-producing Keeley-Frontier mine (production totaled 3.3 million pounds of cobalt) along with the historic Bellellen mine as part of a larger effort to consolidate this historic mining camp in northern Ontario. Additionally, First Cobalt has signed a joint-venture agreement to process mineralized material at a fully permitted cobalt extraction refinery located near the city of Cobalt, Ontario... VIEW PROFILE 
U3O8 Corp.




Last Trade:


CA$0.025







Daily Volume:


61,593





Market Cap:


CA$8.64M









                June 27, 2017                    


                            U3O8 Corp. Announces Terms of Financing Available to Existing Shareholders                        


                June 07, 2017                    


                            U3O8 Corp. Reports Progress on Capital Restructuring / Director Warrant Exercise                        


                May 02, 2017                    


                            U3O8 Corp. Reports on Nuclear Energy Developments in Argentina                        










 







FEATURED NEWS



Nexus Gold Signs LOI to Acquire 250 Sq. Km. Rakounga Gold Concession Contiguous to Bouboulou Project






Kincora Copper Announces Lead Order in Private Placement






Cordoba Minerals Receives Shareholder Approval for Transaction with High Power Exploration Inc.






Secova Metals Completes UAV-MAG Survey at Duvay/Chenier and Better Defines Drill Targets






Balmoral Resources: Bug South Deposit Continues to Deliver Broad Gold Intercepts






Broadway Mining Confirms Down Dip Extension of Massive Sulfide; Intersects 23.8 Meters of 1.247% Copper and 1.843 g/t Gold










			© 2017 Junior Mining Network LLC.
		


Privacy PolicyDisclaimerRSSContact



 













PEA Shows U3O8 Corp's Laguna Salada Deposit




























































































































Trending
Sectors

All Sectors
Technology Metals
Gold, Silver & Base Metals
Technology
AgriBusiness & MMJ
Uranium & Energy
Biotech
CleanTech
Oil & Gas


Videos
Market Analysis
Members
About

Editors
Team
Events
Contact








X

Search

 










Trending
Sectors

Technology Metals
Gold, Silver & Base Metals
AgriBusiness & MMJ
Technology
Uranium & Energy
Biotech
CleanTech
Oil & Gas


More

Videos
Market Analysis
EditorsAdrian NixonEugene GerdenDr. Luc DuchesneNicolas TremblayPeter ClausiReed M. Izatt, PhDSteve MackowskiTracy Weslosky
Members
Events


 








X

Search

 














X

Search

 



Trending
Sectors

Technology Metals
Gold, Silver & Base Metals
AgriBusiness & MMJ
Technology
Uranium & Energy
Biotech
CleanTech
Oil & Gas


More

Videos
Market Analysis
EditorsAdrian NixonEugene GerdenDr. Luc DuchesneNicolas TremblayPeter ClausiReed M. Izatt, PhDSteve MackowskiTracy Weslosky
Members
Events


 



Home » Sectors » Uranium & Energy » Uranium & Energy News 

EDITOR:
        Raj Shah |
        August 5th, 2014 
PEA Shows U3O8 Corp’s Laguna Salada Deposit in Uranium Industry’s Lower Quartile of Cash Costs 
Raj Shah |
        August 05, 2014 |
        No Comments


August 5, 2014 (Source: Marketwired) — U3O8 Corp. (TSX:UWE)(OTCQX:UWEFF), a Canadian-based company focused on exploration and development of uranium resources and associated commodities in South America, reports a favourable Preliminary Economic Assessment (“PEA”) on its Laguna Salada Deposit in Argentina. The PEA shows that uranium at Laguna Salada would be produced at an average life-of-mine (“LOM”) cash cost of $21.62 per pound (“lb”) of U3O8, net of a vanadium by-product credit (Figure 1), and the total capital cost of $134 million would be paid back in 2.5 years. All figures in this press release are in US$, unless otherwise noted.
“The PEA achieved our main goal of showing that Laguna Salada’s cash cost would be well within the lower quartile of the uranium industry – an important achievement that bodes well for the deposit’s potential to ride out cyclical lows in the resource sector,” said Dr. Richard Spencer, U3O8 Corp’s President and CEO. “With a life-of-mine cash cost of $22/lb, Laguna Salada would be competitive with low-cost in-situ recovery uranium projects and with high-grade deposits in the Athabasca Basin. Secondly, the project has a short payback with an average cash cost of $16/b of uranium over that period. This is because the shallow, flat-lying nature of the Laguna Salada Deposit allows us to start production in the higher grade zones where profit margins are greatest. Thirdly, the project’s economics would be significantly enhanced by increasing the resource size – therefore, our immediate goal is to expand the current resource into our adjoining La Susana area.”
PEA Highlights (Pre-Tax Base Case at $60/lb U3O8):

Low cash cost: average cash cost of $16.14/lb of uranium over the payback period; LOM cash cost of $21.62/lb, net of a vanadium credit, and including a 3% net smelter royalty (“NSR”) payable to the State. Therefore, the project would have a healthy operating margin even at current uranium prices and is favourably leveraged to a strengthening uranium price (Figure 2);
Value of initial current resource: net present value (“NPV”), at a 7.5% discount rate, of $55 million, and a pre-tax internal rate of return (“IRR”) of 24% and post-tax IRR of 18%;
Return on capital: total capital cost of $134 million (including start-up capital of $109 million to build the mine and processing plant plus $3 million in sustaining capital for the life-of-mine and $22 million for a 20% contingency on the total capital cost estimate). The payback period is 2.5 years; and
Initial production: 1.3 million pounds (“Mlb”) of uranium produced in year 1, while the average annual production would be 0.64Mlb per year over the 10-year mine life from a continuous surface mining operation. Average annual vanadium production would be 0.96Mlb over the life of the mine.

Dr. Spencer added, “The Laguna Salada PEA marks a key milestone towards positioning U3O8 Corp. among the few companies that could be in production heading into a sustained and growing global uranium supply deficit forecast to start in 2019. Furthermore, the study shows that Laguna Salada is well placed as one of the most advanced uranium projects in Argentina that could satisfy the immediate needs of the country’s current nuclear reactors that presently rely on imported uranium for fuel. Argentina’s third reactor has just come on-stream and deals were signed in the last month related to building a fourth reactor, with talks underway on a fifth. And with district-scale uranium potential evident in the Laguna Salada region, we could serve Argentina’s growing nuclear fleet as well as export to other utilities, supported by the large number of nuclear co-operation agreements that Argentina has signed.”
The PEA is preliminary in nature as it includes inferred mineral resources that are considered too speculative geologically for economic consideration that would enable them to be classified as mineral reserves. Mineral resources are not mineral reserves and do not have demonstrated economic viability. There is no certainty that the results of the PEA will be realized.
Low Cost of Uranium Production
 {  Get our daily investorintel update SubscribeEmail address is invalidThank you for joining InvestorIntel daily email updates!
    }The PEA estimates a LOM cash cost of $21.62/lb of uranium, net of a by-product credit from vanadium, and including a 3% NSR to the State. The vanadium contributes an average of 14% of revenues. This would put the Laguna Salada Deposit well within the lower quartile in terms of cash costs in the uranium industry (Figure 1) and competitive with operating costs of uranium mines in the Athabasca Basin and low-cost in-situ recovery (“ISR”) operations.
A beneficial feature of Laguna Salada is that the mineralization is contained in an unconsolidated, flat lying sheet just below surface, which allows production to start in the richest part of the deposit where revenue would be maximized so that the capital cost can be paid back in 2.5 years. This attribute of the deposit also provides us with flexibility to maintain positive operating margins by tailoring the mining plan to prevailing uranium prices throughout the life of the mine. By taking this approach, initial uranium cash cost averages at $16.14/lb during the payback period or $11.66 in year 1 and $14.05 in year 2, gradually rising as uranium grades decrease over the 10-year mine life for an average cash cost of $21.62 (Figure 2).
Analysts estimate the average marginal cost of production for today’s uranium producers is approximately $40/lb, and that some 50% of the world’s current production is likely to be uneconomic at the present spot price of $28.50/lb1. The PEAs on U3O8 Corp’s Laguna Salada Deposit and its Berlin Deposit in Colombia show that our lead projects have a combined weighted average cash cost of $6.08/lb – one of the lowest in the industry.
To view “Figure 1 – Cash Costs of U3O8 Corp’s Projects Compared with Other Uranium Producers1,” please visit the following link: http://media3.marketwire.com/docs/uwe_pr_aug005_fig01.pdf
To view “Figure 2 – Laguna Salada Cash Cost Per Pound Relative to Forecast Uranium Prices2,” please visit the following link: http://media3.marketwire.com/docs/uwe_pr_aug05_fig02.pdf
Net Present Value (“NPV”) and Internal Rate of Return (“IRR”)
The PEA demonstrates that the project should generate healthy operating margins relative to analysts’ uranium price forecasts (Figure 2). The economic model was based on a $60/lb uranium (U3O8) price and $5.50/lb for vanadium (V2O5) to yield a NPV of $55 million at a 7.5% discount with a pre-tax IRR of 24% and post-tax IRR of 18%. At the consensus uranium price forecast of $70/lb, the project’s NPV (at a 7.5% discount rate) would increase to $98 million, the IRR would increase to 35% and the payback period would shorten to 1.9 years (Table 1).
U3O8 Corp. undertook this PEA before the full extent of the deposit is known in order to have independent verification that Laguna Salada’s production cost would be comparable with the uranium industry’s lowest-cost producers. As both of the IRR and NPV are sensitive to deposit size, our next step is to increase the resource, which would significantly improve both of these economic measures. For example, doubling the size of the Laguna Salada resource from mineralized areas that have a similar grade profile to the current resource and doubling the production rate, would result in the NPV (at a 7.5% discount) increasing to $180 million and the IRR to 44%. The capital cost of a plant and mining operation that has double the capacity would be approximately $55 million more than the current plant design (or a total of $189 million including contingency and sustaining capital) and would produce an average of 1.2Mlb of uranium and approximately 2Mlb of vanadium per year over a 10-year mine life. Therefore, the clear priority is to double the resource – and our immediate target to achieve this is the contiguous La Susana area (December 4, 2013 press release).
Our La Susana exploration area has the potential to increase the current resource to 20-25Mlb3 of uranium (Figure 3) with an exploration budget of approximately $1.8 million. La Susana lies adjacent to the current resource and appears to be an extension of the Laguna Salada Deposit. The La Susana footprint is about the same size as the current Laguna Salada resource and exploration indicates that it has a similar grade profile to Laguna Salada.




(3)
Based on the initial resource and exploration of the La Susana mineralized area, there is an initial conceptual uranium target of 150-225 million tonnes at 50ppm to 60ppm U3O8 (~20-25Mlb U3O8) identified in the Laguna Salada district to date. Potential quantity and grades are conceptual in nature. There has been insufficient exploration to define a mineral resource beyond the current resource, and it is uncertain if further exploration will result in additional mineral resources being delineated in the region.












Table 1 – Discounted Cash Flow Estimates on the Laguna Salada NPV and IRR to Uranium Price





Uranium Price
$45

$50

$60
(Base Case)

$70



Discount Rate
(in $ millions)
0%
$16

$47

$109

$170



5%
($3
)
$22

$70

$118



7.5%
($10
)
$12

$55

$98



10%
($16
)
$4

$43

$82



15%
($25
)
($10
)
$23

$55



IRR
4
%
11
%
24
%
35
%


Pay-back period (years)
4.7

3.7

2.5

1.9





Value per Fully Diluted Share of U3O8 Corp.
U3O8 Corp. has now demonstrated positive economics on its lead projects in Argentina and Colombia with both deposits open for further expansion. Based on an initial NPV of $55 million (7.5% discount) as estimated in the current PEA, Laguna Salada equates to a value of $0.23 per fully diluted U3O8 Corp. share. In addition, the company’s flagship Berlin Project in Colombia has an NPV (7.5% discount) of $338 million based on only one-third of its resource potential for a value of $1.41 per fully diluted U3O8 Corp. share. These two projects together equate to a value of $1.64 per fully diluted U3O8 Corp. share.
To view “Figure 3 – District-Scale Potential in the Laguna Salada Region,” please visit the following link: http://media3.marketwire.com/docs/uwe_pr_aug05_fig03.pdf
Mineral Resources4
The Laguna Salada* PEA is based on the below initial resource prepared in accordance with National Instrument 43-101 (“NI 43-101”) by independent consulting company, Coffey Mining Pty Ltd. (“Coffey Mining”), 2011 (Table 2).




Table 2 – Resource Estimate for the Laguna Salada Deposit





Summary of Resource for the Laguna Salada Project using recommended cut-off grades for the Guanaco and Lago Seco areas


Category of Resource
Lower cut-off (ppm U3O8)
Tonnes (millions)
Average Grade
Contained Metal


Average Grade U3O8 (ppm)
V2O5 (ppm)
U3O8 (millions of lbs)
V2O5 (millions of lbs)


Indicated Resources


Guanaco
25
44.6
55
530
5.5
52.0


Lago Seco
100
2.7
145
840
0.9
5.0


Total Indicated
47.3
60
550
6.3
57.1


Inferred Resources


Guanaco
25
19.4
80
555
3.4
23.7


Lago Seco
100
1.3
130
1,065
0.4
3.1


Total Inferred
20.8
85
590
3.8
26.9








The recommended cut-off grades for the two mineralized areas, taking into account their distinct beneficiation characteristics, are: 25ppm U3O8 for Guanaco and 100ppm U3O8 for Lago Seco.





* Removal of pebbles and coarse sand by screening results in uranium grades increasing by 11 times over the in situ grade of gravel from the Guanaco area and seven times from the Lago Seco area. Vanadium grades increase 3.8 times through beneficiation of gravels from both areas.





(4) May 2011 technical report: “Laguna Salada Project, Chubut Province, Argentina: NI 43-101 Technical Report: Initial Resource Estimate”, which is available at www.u3o8corp.com and on SEDAR at www.sedar.com.




Mining and Processing Methods
Laguna Salada would produce an average of 0.64Mlb per year over the 10-year mine life. The mining operation contemplates the use of two Wirtgen SM2200 (400 tonne per hour (“tph”) capacity) continuous surface miners that cut a 30-40 centimetre layer of unconsolidated gravel with each pass along a trench. Gravel cut from the leading edge of the trench would be trucked a short distance by 50-tonne (“t”) truck-trailers to one of two mobile beneficiation units (360tph capacity) where the gravel would be washed over screens to separate the pebbles and coarse sand from the fine uranium-bearing material. Approximately 90% of the damp gravel would be returned to the trailing edge of the trench to be levelled to the land’s original topography and replanted with indigenous flora. This reclamation would be continuous throughout the mine life and ensures that no open excavation would be left on completion of mining.
The fine mineralized material derived from the gravel (8% of the original mass from the Guanaco area of the deposit and 11% from the Lago Seco area) would be mixed with water and pumped to a central hydrometallurgical plant. Fine material from Lago Seco would enter a hydrocyclone system for further beneficiation and the fine material in the overflow, containing the majority of the uranium, would then be mixed with fine material from the Guanaco sector for further processing. Residual gypsum in the combined fines would be leached with saline shallow groundwater from the property and the sulphate would be separated from that solution in a membrane system so that the saline water can be recirculated. Extraction of uranium and vanadium would be by alkaline leach at a temperature of 80°C, followed by the precipitation of a uranium-vanadium intermediate product. The PEA contemplates separation of the uranium and vanadium and calcining of the uranium to produce a high-grade uranium oxide as well as recovery of the vanadium as ammonium metavanadate (calcining of which would produce vanadium pentoxide).
The next steps toward development of the Laguna Salada Deposit would be further hydrometallurgical test work and an on-site pilot plant in which beneficiation tests would be undertaken, both of which would be to feasibility standards.
Capital Costs
The PEA estimates a $134 million capital cost, the main constituents of which are $14 million for mining and beneficiation equipment, $79 million for the processing plant, indirect costs of $11 million and contingency of $22 million (Table 3).




Table 3 – Summary of Capital Costs






Items
(in $millions)




Working capital
$2.5




Mining
$14.3




Sustaining capital
$3.3




Mine closure*
$2.0




Process plant and infrastructure
$79.1




Indirect costs (EPCM, insurance, temporary works, first fills & spares etc.)
$10.9




Contingency of 20%
$21.9




TOTAL
$134.0












*Mine site reclamation and closure would be ongoing during the life of the mine and the majority of this cost is captured in operating costs.




Operating Costs
Revenue of approximately $10/t of mineralized gravel against operating costs of $5.56/t would generate operating cash flow of $4.43/t (Table 4).




Table 4 – Summary of Operating Costs






Items
Per tonne of mineralized gravel




Revenue
$9.99




Operating Costs:





Revenue-based royalties
$0.25




Mining
$0.99




Processing & G&A
$4.32




Total Operating Costs:
$5.56




Operating Cash Flow
$4.43





The Laguna Salada PEA technical report, prepared in accordance with NI 43-101, will be filed on SEDAR within 45 days of this news release.
Qualified Persons and Accreditation
The PEA was conducted under the supervision of Mr. Louis de Klerk, Pr. Eng. (South Africa), at Tenova Mining & Minerals (formerly Bateman Engineering N.V.) (“TMM”) in Perth, Australia. TMM is part of the Techint Group, a leading global engineering firm that has been providing process design, development and construction services to the resource sector for over 90 years and has extensive and specific process and engineering experience in the extraction of uranium and vanadium. Projects undertaken by TMM include AREVA’s Imouraren, Cameco’s Key Lake, by-product uranium from Harmony Gold’s mines, Rio Tinto’s Rossing mine, Kazatomprom’s Honeymoon ISL uranium mine, Sinosteel’s Crocker Well uranium project, an alkaline leach facility at UCIL’s Gogi uranium project, a feasibility study on Bannerman’s Etango uranium project and most recently, a feasibility study on Toro Energy’s Wiluna project, which has many similarities with the Laguna Salada Deposit. For more information, see www.tenovagroup.com.
Mr. Pedro Pino Veliz, Director of PEK Teknep Overseas Engenharia Ltda (“PEK”), was responsible for the mine design and financial model. Mr. Veliz is a Civil Mining Engineer (P.E.) (Brazil), Eng. Dr. (IT) SME with over 35 years of mining operations experience. PEK has extensive experience serving its Brazilian and international clients with rock mechanics, rock characterization, underground stability and hydrological studies, feasibility studies and designing and planning of surface mining, open pit mines and underground mines. This has included detailed design of tunnels and stations, methods of excavation and specifications for support methods in the expansion of the Rio de Janeiro subway system for the 2014 World Cup and 2016 Olympic Games. Numerous projects for Rio Tinto included the Salobo Copper open pit mine, the Fortaleza de Minas open pit/underground nickel project, Rossing Uranium expansion project and study of surface Voest Alpine Continuous Miners for the Morro do Ouro gold mine.
Mine and tailing facility design was by PEK, with associated operating and capital cost estimates, as well as related general and administrative costs. TMM was responsible for the PEA design of the hydrometallurgical plant from receipt of the beneficiated slurry from the scrub-screen units, as well as for the associated operational and capital expenditure and general and administrative cost estimates. Pricing of reagents was done by TMM and U3O8 Corp. Product price assumptions were made by U3O8 Corp. The economic model was constructed by PEK using capital and operating cost estimates from TMM for the hydrometallurgical plant and from PEK for the mine plan and beneficiation units.
Mr. John Goode, P.Eng (Ontario) is an independent consultant with 50 years of experience in metallurgy and related test work. He oversaw the metallurgical test work carried out on the Laguna Salada Project. Mr. Goode is a Fellow of the Canadian Institute of Mining, Metallurgy and Petroleum (CIM) and a Fellow of the Australasian Institute of Mining & Metallurgy (AusIMM).
Mr. Johann van der Westhuysen (PrEng (Chem)), Managing Director of Synexus (Pty) Ltd. (“Synexus”), was responsible for the membrane separation developments and their integration in the overall process for the Laguna Salada Project. Mr. van der Westhuysen is a Professional Engineer with the Engineering Council of South Africa and a Chartered Chemical Engineer with the Engineering Council of the United Kingdom. Synexus is a process engineering company specializing in the application of membrane systems in hydrometallurgical and related processes.
Each of the individuals named above is a qualified person as defined in NI 43-101 of the Canadian Securities Administrators (“QP”), is independent of U3O8 Corp. and has verified his related technical disclosure presented in this press release.
The PEA has relied on the NI 43-101 resource estimate prepared by Mr. Neil Inwood, a Fellow of The Australian Institute of Mining and Metallurgy and a QP, who was employed by Coffey Mining at the time of the writing of the report. Mr. Inwood is independent of U3O8 Corp. As Mr. Inwood is no longer with Coffey Mining, Coffey Mining has reviewed the information related to the mineral resources as derived from the original report and consents to its inclusion, form and context in this press release.
Dr. Richard Spencer, Ph.D,, BSc(Hons), P.Geo. (Ontario), C.Geo. (UK), is President & CEO of U3O8 Corp. and a QP, and has supervised the preparation of, and verified the technical information contained in this press release relating to the Laguna Salada Project.
About U3O8 Corp.
U3O8 Corp. is focused on exploration and development of uranium resources and associated commodities in South America. The company’s uranium resources comprise three deposits defined in accordance with NI 43-101 located in Colombia, Argentina and Guyana:

Berlin Deposit, Colombia – a PEA shows that Berlin could be a zero cash cost uranium producer thanks to revenue from by-products of phosphate, vanadium, nickel, rare earths (yttrium and neodymium) and other metals occurring in the same deposit;
Laguna Salada Deposit, Argentina – a near surface, free-digging uranium, vanadium deposit that is potentially amenable to low-cost mining and processing methods; and
Kurupung Deposit, Guyana – an initial uranium deposit in a large emerging uranium district.

Additional information on U3O8 Corp., its mineral resources and technical reports are available at www.u3o8corp.com. Follow U3O8 Corp. on Facebook: www.facebook.com/u3o8corp, Twitter: www.twitter.com/u3o8corp and Youtube: www.youtube.com/u3o8corp.
Forward-Looking Statements
Certain information in this release are forward-looking statements with respect to the development plans, economic potential and growth targets of U3O8 Corp’s current projects. Forward-looking statements consist of statements that are not purely historical, including statements regarding beliefs, plans, expectations or intensions for the future, and include, but not limited to, statements with respect to: (a) the low-cost, near-term production goal of Laguna Salada, (b) the Laguna Salada and Berlin PEAs, (c) the market opportunities for uranium in Argentina and internationally, and (d) the potential of the Kurupung district in Guyana. Basis for such assumptions include that: (i) actual results of our exploration, resource goals, metallurgical testing, economic studies and development activities will continue to be positive and proceed as planned, and assumptions in the Laguna Salada and Berlin PEAs prove to be accurate, (ii) requisite regulatory and governmental approvals will be received on a timely basis on terms acceptable to U3O8 Corp., and (iii) economic, political and industry market conditions will be favourable. However, such statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results, performance or developments to differ materially from those contained in the statements, including, but not limited to: (1) that a mine will be achieved on the Laguna Salada Project in compliance with current Chubut mining law, (2) that a mine will be achieved on the Berlin Deposit and other exploration projects, (3) that beneficiation test work will continue to be favourable and results from small scale metallurgical testing can be duplicated on a larger scale, (4) the inherent uncertainties and speculative nature associated with exploration results, resource estimates, potential resource growth, future metallurgical test results, changes in project parameters as plans evolve, (5) volatility of commodity prices; (6) dependence on regulatory approvals and changes in legislation, environmental compliance, community support and the political and economic climate, (7) availability of future financing, and (8) exploration risk and other factors beyond the control of U3O8 Corp. including those factors set out in the “Risk Factors” in our Annual Information Form available on SEDAR at www.sedar.com. Readers are cautioned that the assumptions used in the preparation of such information, although considered reasonable at the time of preparation, may prove to be imprecise and, as such, undue reliance should not be placed on forward-looking statements. U3O8 Corp. assumes no obligation to update such information, except as may be required by law. 
 

AgriBusiness & MMJ News Technology Metals News Uranium & Energy News







0
 











 

Editor: Raj Shah

			Raj Shah has professional experience working for over a half a dozen years at financial firms such as Merrill Lynch and First Allied Securities Inc., ...  <Read more about Raj Shah> 




 
				Copyright © 2017 InvestorIntel Corp. All rights reserved.
				More & Disclaimer »



Recommended

 



July 27, 2017Zinc One Resources – Where Grade is KingJuly 26, 2017Kirill Klip on the global market demand for lithiumJuly 26, 2017Nouveau Monde and Shinzoom partner to take on the NA Li-Ion  ...July 26, 2017White Graphene: It is white but not graphene…July 25, 2017Lead: Valuable Metal but Toxic at Any Concentration — What ...July 25, 2017Wajd Boubou on the manganese market and Giyani MetalsJuly 25, 2017Resurging Commodity Markets: The Rare Earths (Part 2)July 24, 2017Kazakhstan focuses on the global vanadium marketJuly 24, 2017Lynas defies market to become a super metal heavy weightJuly 24, 2017Search of Excellence – Part 3July 20, 20172017 – The Year of Alkane ResourcesJuly 19, 2017TerraX responds to coverage on becoming the next major playe ... 



 
Leave a Reply Cancel reply 
Your email address will not be published. Required fields are marked *Comment Name * 
Email * 
  Notify me of replies to this post
 Notify me of new posts via email
 

 



Trending








Market Analysis IntelTechnology Metals Intel

InvestorIntel Rare Earths Monthly – June 2017July 07, 2017 Steve Mackowski |
			July 07, 2017 |
			10 Comments


To those who contacted me with some feedback on my new three-pronged series of articles, thanks for that. Although can […]










CleanTech IntelTechnology Metals Intel

Vanadium – Heard it on the GrapevineJuly 18, 2017 Christopher Ecclestone |
			July 18, 2017 |
			10 Comments


In the mining sector if one hangs around long enough, that which was once a subject of excitement and then […]



  News








Technology Metals News

Northern Minerals Limited: WA Premier marks commencement of works at Browns RangeJuly 28, 2017 InvestorIntel |
			July 28, 2017 











CleanTech NewsTechnology Metals News

Neometals Ltd.: Quarterly Cashflow ReportJuly 28, 2017 InvestorIntel |
			July 28, 2017 











CleanTech NewsTechnology Metals News

Neometals Ltd.: Quarterly Activities ReportJuly 28, 2017 InvestorIntel |
			July 28, 2017 











Gold, Silver & Base Metals News

Scorpio Gold’s 2017 Phase I Drilling Encounters High-Grade Gold Proximal to Underground Mine Workings at the Goldwedge Project, NevadaJuly 27, 2017 InvestorIntel |
			July 27, 2017 

July 27, 2017 (Source) – Scorpio Gold Corporation (“Scorpio Gold” or the “Company”) (TSX-V:SGN) is pleased to report final results from […]










Gold, Silver & Base Metals Intel

Zinc One Resources – Where Grade is KingJuly 27, 2017 Christopher Ecclestone |
			July 27, 2017 

A year ago one could have quoted The Rime of the Ancient Mariner to describe the hunt for a worthwhile […]










Technology News

Cloud Nine Education Group Ltd. Strengthens Board and Management TeamJuly 27, 2017 InvestorIntel |
			July 27, 2017 

July 27, 2017 (Source) – Cloud Nine Education Group Ltd. (the “Company” or “Cloud Nine”) (CSE:CNI) is pleased to announce the […]










Gold, Silver & Base Metals News

Sage Gold Receives Final Tranche of Clavos FinancingJuly 27, 2017 InvestorIntel |
			July 27, 2017 

July 27, 2017 (Source) – Sage Gold Inc. (“Sage” or the “Company”) (TSX VENTURE:SGX) has drawn down the third and final […]






Click here for more News




   



Learn More

Technology Metals
Gold, Silver & Base Metals
Technology
AgriBusiness & MMJ
CleanTech
Biotech
Oil & Gas
Uranium & Energy


About

Members
Editors
Team


Support

Contact
Privacy
Disclaimer


 
Copyright © 2017 InvestorIntel Corp. All rights reserved.
































U3O8 Corp. Reports on Argentine Government's Support for Local Uranium Production, and on Other Developments in the Nuclear Energy Industry in Argentina - Oil & Gas 360
































































EnerCom, Inc.
The Oil & Gas Conference
EnerCom Dallas
Sponsors



 



Advertise on 360




Email Subscription













































  






Home
Industry News
360 Profiles
Event Calendar
Press Releases
Video



















U3O8 Corp. Reports on Argentine Government’s Support for Local Uranium Production, and on Other Developments in the Nuclear Energy Industry in Argentina


				in Press     			by— 360 Feed Wire 




Share 
Print 
















 July 7, 2016 - 6:45 AM EDT



































close




Email this News Article



Your Name



Your Email



Friend's Name



Friend's Email



Receive Copy:

yes               
				

























U3O8 Corp. Reports on Argentine Government's Support for Local Uranium Production, and on Other Developments in the Nuclear Energy Industry in Argentina



U3O8 Corp. Reports on Argentine Government's Support for Local Uranium Production, and on Other Developments in the Nuclear Energy Industry in Argentina
Canada NewsWire
TORONTO, July 7, 2016

Outlines next steps for the Laguna Salada Deposit
TORONTO, July 7, 2016 /CNW/ - U3O8 Corp. (TSX: UWE; OTCQX: UWEFF; SSE: UWECL), a Canadian-based company focused on the development of deposits of uranium and associated commodities, many of which are used in the clean energy industry, reports on significant developments in nuclear energy in Argentina, South America's largest generator of electricity from nuclear:

Argentina's Minister of Energy and Mines emphasized the Federal Government's support for uranium production from Argentina to fuel its growing fleet of nuclear power plants; 
Argentina has signed an agreement whereby it will import enriched uranium to fuel its small modular reactor ("SMR"), on which construction is nearing completion. The Argentine-designed CAREM-25 model is one of the first modern SMRs to be built in the world. Numerous other SMR designs, for example those in Canada, USA, UK, China and Japan, are advancing through the design and permitting stage. SMRs are projected to be a high-growth area in the nuclear and clean energy industry; 
A memorandum of understanding has been signed regarding the financing and construction of Argentina's 4th and 5th nuclear power plants; and 
The Minister of Energy and Mines has committed to fund upgrades to eleven nuclear medicine facilities in Argentina. 

To the Company's knowledge, there are only three uranium deposits on which economic studies have been concluded in Argentina: one has been mined out and the other two include the State's Cerro Solo and U3O8 Corp.'s Laguna Salada deposits.  Production from these deposits could provide the uranium required by Argentina's nuclear reactors and alleviate Argentina's total reliance on imported nuclear fuel.  
Argentine Federal Government support for local uranium production
At a recent meeting with Senator Luenzo from Chubut Province, Energy and Mines Minister, Mr. Jose Aranguren, emphasized the new Federal Government's support for the development of the uranium mining industry in Argentina1.    
To the Company's knowledge, there are three uranium deposits on which economic studies have been undertaken in Argentina.  The first, the Sierra Pintada Deposit, has been mined out.  The other two deposits are located in Chubut Province:

U3O8 Corp.'s Laguna Salada Deposit on which a resource estimate2 and subsequent preliminary economic assessment ("PEA")3 has been completed in accordance with National Instrument 43-101 ("NI-43-101"). The cash cost of production at Laguna Salada was estimated at US$22 per pound of uranium net of by-product vanadium. If actual costs are in line with this estimate, Laguna Salada would be within the lower 25% of the uranium industry in terms of production cost. The Company believes that these estimates contained in the PEA, and the assumptions upon which they are based, remain current. (The PEA is preliminary in nature, and includes inferred mineral resources that are considered too speculative geologically to have the economic considerations applied to them that would enable them to be categorized as mineral reserves. There is no certainty that the results of the PEA will be realized); and 
The Cerro Solo Deposit, which belongs to Argentina's National Atomic Energy Commission ("CNEA"), is located approximately 150km from U3O8 Corp.'s Laguna Salada Deposit. CNEA has undertaken a resource estimate and economic assessment of Cerro Solo, but has not released its economic study, and hence production cost estimates are not available in the public domain. Cerro Solo is a sandstone-hosted deposit that would most likely be mined by underground methods.

Argentina purchases enriched uranium to fuel one of the world's first Small Modular Reactors
Brazil recently announced that it has entered into an agreement to sell four tonnes of enriched uranium to Argentina to fuel its prototype CAREM-25 small modular reactor4.  The CAREM-25 reactor is one of two SMRs with generation capacity of less than 50 Megawatts under construction worldwide5.  The CAREM-25 reactor is scheduled to start generating electricity in late 2017 while the other SMR of similar size is under construction in Russia.  The CAREM-25 is a pressurized water reactor with integral steam generators and the entire, passive coolant system is contained within the 3.5 metre diameter, 11 metre high pressure vessel; the reactor vessel would be similar in size to a 40 foot shipping container.  The reactor would be refuelled annually with standard enriched reactor fuel6.  
At 25 Megawatts, the CAREM-25 model would have an output of only 1.5%-2.5% of a typical Generation III nuclear reactor.  Some of the SMRs, of which there are many designs progressing through the permitting process in various countries, are generally based on technology similar to that which has been used in nuclear-powered submarines and ships for almost 60 years.  SMRs are projected to have a relatively low capital cost, and are designed to have low operating costs to provide an affordable, low-carbon source of energy. The CAREM-25 prototype is being built to unequivocally demonstrate the cost of construction as well as to define the actual cost of clean energy production.
SMR's are expected to be a high-growth area for the nuclear and clean energy industry because the plants can be located close to where the electricity is needed without the environmental footprint, cost and energy loss associated with regional high-tension power lines connecting the end user with the regional electricity grid.  Apart from providing power for communities and industries in remote locations, the CAREM-25 reactor is being marketed as a clean power source for the production of fresh water by the desalination of seawater.  To that end, a joint venture has been established between the Argentine company INVAP and the Saudi Arabian nuclear power authority to determine the suitability of the CAREM-25 reactor for desalination plants in Saudi Arabia7.  
Agreement signed regarding the construction of Argentina's 4th and 5th nuclear power plants
Minister Aranguren has announced the signing of a memorandum of understanding reaffirming plans for the financing and construction of two nuclear power plants, Argentina's 4th and 5th.  Chinese banks will contribute 85% of the total estimated cost of US$15 billion8.  To put the cost of the reactors in context, Argentina is currently spending US$7 billion per year on energy imports.  
Argentina's 4th reactor will be a Canadian-designed, 800 Megawatt CANDU model that uses natural (un-enriched) uranium fuel.  Construction is planned to commence in the first quarter of 2017 at the site where the Atucha I and II reactors are located.   
The 5th nuclear power plant will be a 1,150 Megawatt Hualong 1 reactor, a design by China General Nuclear and China National Nuclear Corp., that uses enriched fuel. Construction on the 5th plant is planned to start in the latter half of 2019.  
Federal funding for nuclear medicine facility in Chubut Province
Minister Aranguren also confirmed that the Federal Government is committed to Argentina's National Nuclear Medicine Plan through which eleven nuclear medicine centres throughout the country will be upgraded.  One of the centres for which funding has been guaranteed is the CABIN (Centro de Aplicaciones Bionucleares) facility in the city of Comodoro Rivadavia in Chubut Province.9
Planning for the Laguna Salada Deposit
The next steps planned for the Laguna Salada Deposit are trial mining and pilot plant processing of bulk samples at one of Argentina's processing facilities.  The aim of this work is to refine mining and processing costs to feasibility study standards as well as to provide proof of concept for uranium production from mineralized gravels at Laguna Salada.
Laguna Salada lies in the "Roaring Forties": latitudes renowned for high winds.  To that end, the Company is involved with a high-level study to investigate the viability of incorporating wind-generated power into the Project as a means of further improving the Project's economics.  In addition, although nuclear reactors do not generate greenhouse gases, nuclear energy is not classified as "carbon-free" because of the use of fossil fuels in the mining and transport of uranium.  Incorporation of renewable energy into uranium production from Laguna Salada provides an opportunity to produce a low-carbon uranium product that would allow our future customers to move closer to "carbon-free" nuclear energy.  
U3O8 Corp. is committed to providing uranium required to fuel the nuclear component of the Argentine government's clean energy initiative.  That initiative includes increasing Argentina's nuclear energy capacity as well as increasing renewable energy production: the recently announced target is to have 8% of the country's electricity generated by renewable sources by the end of 2017 and 20% by 2020.10
Technical Information
Dr. Richard Spencer, P.Geo., President and CEO of U3O8 Corp. and a Qualified Person as defined by NI 43-101, has reviewed the technical information in this news release relating to the Laguna Salada Deposit and the associated PEA.
About U3O8 Corp.
U3O8 Corp. is focused on exploration and development of deposits of uranium and associated commodities in South America.  Potential by-products from uranium production include commodities used in the energy storage industry – in the manufacture of batteries - such as nickel, vanadium and phosphate.  The Company's mineral resources estimates were made in accordance with National Instrument 43-101, and are contained in three deposits:  

Laguna Salada Deposit, Argentina – a PEA shows this near surface, free-digging uranium - vanadium deposit has low production-cost potential; 
Berlin Deposit, Colombia – a PEA shows that Berlin also has low-cost uranium production potential due to revenue that would be generated from by-products of phosphate, vanadium, nickel, rare earths (yttrium and neodymium) and other metals that occur within the deposit; and 
Kurupung Deposit, Guyana – a uranium resource has been estimated in four veins within a uranium-zirconium vein system. Resources have been estimated on four veins, while consistent mineralization of the same type has been intersected in scout drilling of an additional six veins, while yet other veins require first-time exploration drilling.

Information on U3O8 Corp., its resources and technical reports are available at www.u3o8corp.com and on SEDAR at www.sedar.com.  Follow U3O8 Corp. on Facebook: www.facebook.com/u3o8corp, Twitter: www.twitter.com/u3o8corp and Youtube: www.youtube.com/u3o8corp.  
Forward-Looking Statements Certain information in this release are forward-looking statements with respect to the development plans and economic potential of U3O8 Corp's current projects.  Forward-looking statements consist of statements that are not purely historical, including statements regarding beliefs, plans, expectations or intentions for the future, and include, but not limited to, statements with respect to: (a) the low-cost development goal of Laguna Salada, (b) the Laguna Salada and Berlin PEAs, and (c) the potential of the Kurupung district in Guyana.  Basis for such assumptions include that: (i) actual results of our exploration, resource goals, metallurgical testing, economic studies and development activities will continue to be positive and proceed as planned, and assumptions in the Laguna Salada and Berlin PEAs prove to be accurate, (ii) requisite regulatory and governmental approvals will be received on a timely basis on terms acceptable to U3O8 Corp., and (iii) economic, political and industry market conditions will be favourable. However, such statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results, performance or developments to differ materially from those contained in the statements, including, but not limited to: (1) that a mine will be achieved on the Laguna Salada Project, the Berlin Deposit and other exploration projects, (2) that beneficiation test work will continue to be favourable and results from small scale metallurgical testing can be duplicated on a larger scale, (3) the inherent uncertainties and speculative nature associated with exploration results, resource estimates, potential resource growth, future metallurgical test results, changes in project parameters as plans evolve, (4) volatility of commodity prices and market conditions for uranium; (5) dependence on regulatory approvals and changes in legislation, environmental compliance, community support and the political and economic climate, (6) availability of future financing, and (7) exploration risk and other factors beyond the control of U3O8 Corp. including those factors set out in the "Risk Factors" in our Annual Information Form available on SEDAR at www.sedar.com. Readers are cautioned that the assumptions used in the preparation of such information, although considered reasonable at the time of preparation, may prove to be imprecise and, as such, undue reliance should not be placed on forward-looking statements. U3O8 Corp. assumes no obligation to update such information, except as may be required by law. For more information on the above-noted PEAs, refer to the September 18, 2014 technical report titled "Preliminary Economic Assessment of the Laguna Salada Uranium-Vanadium Deposit, Chubut Province, Argentina" and the January 18, 2013 technical report titled "U3O8 Corp. Preliminary Economic Assessment on the Berlin Deposit, Colombia."
1 Aranguren, interesado por desarrollar uranio integral en Chubut. Diario Once. http://www.oncediario.com.ar/clientes/diario11/index.php?option=com_content&view=article&id=15832:aranguren-interesado-por-desarrollar-uranio-integral-en-chubut&catid=36:chubut&Itemid=196&utm_source=newsletter&utm_medium=email&utm_campaign=noticias_mineras_todos_los_dias
2 May 20, 2011: "Laguna Salada Project, Chubut Province, Argentina, NI 43-101 Technical Report on Laguna Salada:  Initial Resource Estimate." prepared by Tenova Mining & Minerals (Australia) Pty Ltd.
3 September 18, 2014 technical report:  "Preliminary Economic Assessment of the Laguna Salada Uranium Vanadium Deposit, Chubut Province, Argentina."  prepared by Tenova Mining & Minerals (Australia) Pty Ltd.  
4 "Brazil to export enriched uranium."  World Nuclear News.  http://www.world-nuclear-news.org/UF-Brazil-to-export-enriched-uranium-2206167.html
5 "Small nuclear power reactors." World Nuclear Association. http://www.world-nuclear.org/information-library/nuclear-fuel-cycle/nuclear-power-reactors/small-nuclear-power-reactors.aspx
6 "Nuclear Power in Argentina." World Nuclear Association. http://www.world-nuclear.org/information-library/country-profiles/countries-a-f/argentina.aspx
7 "Saudi Arabia and Argentina form R&D joint venture." World Nuclear News. http://www.world-nuclear-news.org/NP-Saudi-Arabia-and-Argentina-form-joint-venture-0903158.html
8 "China and Argentina reaffirm reactor agreement." World Nuclear News. http://www.world-nuclear-news.org/NN-China-and-Argentina-reaffirm-reactor-agreement-0107164.html
9 See note 1.
10 "Argentina Launches Major Push for Renewable Energy." The Wall Street Journal.  http://www.wsj.com/articles/argentina-launches-major-push-for-renewable-energy-1463611609
SOURCE  U3O8 Corp.




please contact:  U3O8 Corp. - (416) 868-1491, Richard Spencer, President & CEO, [email protected] CNW Group 2016

Source: Canada Newswire
				(July 7, 2016 - 6:45 AM EDT) 

				News by QuoteMedia
www.quotemedia.com




















  

Press Releases by CategoryGovernance
Earnings
Webcasts / Conference Calls
Finance
360 Articles by CategoryAnalysis
Arctic
Canada
Discoveries
Earnings
Finance
Fracing
International
M & A
Midstream
MLPs
Offshore
OIlfield Services
OPEC
Politics & Unrest
Regulatory
360 Profiles Blackbird Energy Core Laboratories International Frontier Resources Manitok Energy Nighthawk Energy PDC Energy PetroQuest Energy Range Resources Samson Oil & Gas Tamarack Valley Energy Whiting Petroleum WPX Energy Yuma Energy 
 
Chart of the Week

 

Effective Rig Count Breaks 2,000 for First Time in June

July 18, 2017
—
Comments are Disabled

Permian EERC pushes to 1,135 EnerCom released its monthly EnerCom Effective Rig Count today. The Effective Rig Count now reports an equivalent 2,015 rigs active in the U.S., up from 1954 last month. The Effective Rig Count adjusts reported rig counts for increasing efficiency in drilling and completions. There are significantly fewer rigs active in the U.S. today than in[Read More…]








 




 



Industry Calendar 
 

Contact Oil & Gas 360® c/o EnerCom, Inc.
800 18th Street
Suite 200
Denver, CO 80202

Bevo Beaven
Editor
303-296-8834
 

Advertise on OAG360 OAG360 has multiple advertising opportunities.  Reach your investors/buyers by advertising on the website, eMail campaigns, webcasts and videos. 


Learn More
 

Twitter 
 

 

 
 


		
				Copyright © 2017 — Oil & Gas 360®. All Rights Reserved. 
				 About 360 | Advertise | Subscribe | Contact | From the Experts at EnerCom, Inc.













  UWE:Toronto Stock Quote - U3O8 Corp - Bloomberg Markets              

       



     Error: Could not add to watchlist. X   + Watchlist  U3O8 Corp   UWE:CN   Toronto        0.03CAD   0.00   0.00%     As of 3:42 PM EDT 7/28/2017     Open   0.03    Day Range   0.02 - 0.03    Volume   90,093    Previous Close   0.03    52Wk Range   0.02 - 0.06    1 Yr Return   -28.57%                   


                Before it's here, it's on the Bloomberg Terminal.
            

                Learn More
            

         Open   0.03    Day Range   0.02 - 0.03    Volume   90,093    Previous Close   0.03    52Wk Range   0.02 - 0.06    1 Yr Return   -28.57%    YTD Return   -16.67%    Current P/E Ratio (TTM)   -    Earnings per Share (CAD) (TTM)   -0.01    Market Cap (m CAD)   8.630    Shares Outstanding  (m)   345.198    Price/Sales (TTM)   -    Dividend Indicated Gross Yield   -        Sector Energy   % Price Change -0.19%     Industry Energy   % Price Change -0.19%                    Related Videos  There are currently no related videos for this ticker. Please check back later.    Company News Press Releases   There are currently no news stories for this ticker. Please check back later.     6/27/2017   U3O8 Corp. Announces Terms of Financing Available to its Existing Shareholders     6/23/2017   U3O8 Corp. Announces Results of Shareholder Meeting and Warrant Cancellation     6/7/2017   U3O8 Corp. Reports Progress on Capital Restructuring / Director Warrant Exercise     5/29/2017   Aurania Resources Ltd. Announces the Appointment of Dr. Richard Spencer as President and Shareholder Approval of the Lost Citie     5/29/2017   Aurania Resources Ltd. Announces the Appointment of Dr. Richard Spencer as President and Shareholder Approval of the Lost Citie     5/25/2017   U3O8 Corp. Announces that David Marsh, a Metallurgist with Extensive Experience in the Design, Construction and Operation of Ur     5/23/2017   U3O8 Corp. Announces Intention to Seek Shareholder Approval for a Share Consolidation at its Annual Special Meeting     5/2/2017   U3O8 Corp. Reports on Nuclear Energy Developments in Argentina     3/30/2017   U3O8 Corp. Stakes the Old La Niquelina Uranium-Cobalt-Nickel Mine     3/23/2017   U3O8 Corp. Provides Quarterly Update on Activities    There are currently no press releases for this ticker. Please check back later.      Profile   U308 Corp. is a uranium exploration company. The Company focuses on the development and exploration of uranium projects in Colombia, Argentina and Guyana    Address  401 Bay StreetSuite 2702Toronto, ON M5H 2Y4Canada   Phone  1-416-868-1491   Website   www.u308corp.com     Executives Board Members    Richard Spencer  President/CEO    John C Ross  Chief Financial Officer    Elpidio Reis  Chief Operating Officer     Show More         






Board of Directors – U3O8 Corp

























































Loading stock data... 


FacebookTwitterYoutubeLinkedin 







Board of DirectorsDeep experience in resource industry in South America


The Board consists of exploration professionals that have an enviable track record of mineral discoveries blended with entrepreneurs and seasoned business leaders that have raised over $2.5 billion in financing for resource companies and have been involved in numerous mergers and acquisitions totalling over $15 billion in value.


Dr. Keith M. Barron, B.Sc., Ph.D Founder, Chair of the Safety, Health, Environment, Community and Technical Committee- Founded Aurelian Resources & discovered the 13 million ounce Fruta del Norte gold deposit in Ecuador. Aurelian was sold to Kinross Gold for $1.2 billion.
- Owner & operator of private mine that is the USA’s only commercial sapphire producer, along with gold from gravel that is similar to the host of uranium and vanadium at U3O8 Corp.’s Laguna Salada Deposit in Argentina.
- Recipient of PDAC’s Thayer Lindsley International Discovery Award – 2008
- Northern Miner’s Mining Man of the Year – 2008
U3O8 Corp
Mr. David Constable, BSc, MBA, ICD.DChairman of the Board- Involved in eight M&A transactions with a total value of $10 billion including the sale of Australia’s Normandy Mining to Newmont; the merger of FNX Mining with Quadra Resources; the sale of Gold Eagle Mines to Goldcorp; and the sale of Aquiline Resources to Pan American Silver after the discovery of the massive Navidad silver deposit in Argentina;
- Headed up Investor Relations (IR) at Normandy Mining & subsequently at Toronto-based FNX Mining during the discoveries in Sudbury that took the Company from junior explorer to a producer with a multi-billion dollar market cap;
- Holds a ICD.D designation from Institute of Canadian Directors.
U3O8 Corp
Mr. David Franklin, MBAChair of Audit Committee - Co-founder, and is Managing Director of WoodsWater Capital LP, a resource-focused private equity firm;
- Formerly CEO of Sprott Private Wealth;
- Was market strategist at Sprott where he co-wrote the widely-followed monthly note “Markets at a Glace” with Eric Sprott;
- Has put together numerous M&A deals.
U3O8 Corp
Mr. Pablo Marcet, BSc, MSc, MBAChair of the Compensation, Corporate Governance and Nominating Committee- Involved in the start-up the giant Escondida copper mine in Chile;
- As President of Northern Orion, oversaw advancement of the Agua Rica copper-gold porphyry deposit towards development in Argentina and subsequent takeover of Northern Orion by Yamana Gold for $1.6 billion;
- Was President of Waymar Resources which made a gold discovery in Colombia and subsequently merged with Orosur Mining that has an operating gold mine in Uruguay;
- Pablo lives in Argentina.
U3O8 Corp
Mr. Darin Milmeister, B.Sc (Business Admin)Director- Graduate of Georgetown University - B.Sc in Business Administration, Finance & Accounting;
- Initially was with Deutsche Bank in leveraged finance;
- Was a principal of Delaware Street Capital managing long/short fund focused on basic materials; &
- Currently founder & Managing Partner of Extract Capital – a resource-focused fund
U3O8 CorpDr. Richard Spencer, BSc(Hons), PhD, CGeol, PGeoDirector, President and CEO- Target generation & exploration of the giant gold-uranium deposits of the Witwatersrand Basin in South Africa;
- Led the exploration teams that:
• Discovered the 3.3 million ounce Quimsacocha / Loma Larga gold deposit in Ecuador (also contains 23 million ounces of silver);
• Increased the gold reserve at the Las Cristinas deposit in Venezuela by 65% from 10.2 million ounces to 16.8 million ounces;
• Discovered a belt of porphyry copper deposits in Ecuador. Resources are: 23 billion pounds of copper & 4 million ounces of gold in the Mirador, Panantza & San Carlos deposits.
U3O8 Corp
   

News Sign-Up 


Thanks for signing up!


Join U3O8 Corp's mailing list to have the latest news and updates delivered straight to your inbox.






Email Address 
Sign Up
By submitting this form, you are granting: U3O8 Corp, 8 King Street East, Toronto, Ontario, M5C1B5, Canada,  permission to email you. You may unsubscribe via the link found at the bottom of every email.  (See our Email Privacy Policy for details.) Emails are serviced by Constant Contact.






Latest Press ReleasesU3O8 Corp.  Announces Terms of Financing Available to its Existing ShareholdersJune 27, 2017 - 9:00 amU3O8 Corp. Announces Results of Shareholder Meeting and Warrant CancellationJune 23, 2017 - 9:00 amU3O8 Corp. Reports Progress on Capital Restructuring / Director Warrant ExerciseJune 6, 2017 - 3:16 pmU3O8 Corp. Announces that David Marsh, a Metallurgist with Extensive Experience in the Design, Construction and Operation of Uranium Extraction Plants, is to Stand for Election as a DirectorMay 25, 2017 - 9:05 amFacebookTwitter 

























Scroll to top










Company Overview – U3O8 Corp

























































Loading stock data... 


FacebookTwitterYoutubeLinkedin 







Company OverviewA Green Commodities Company.


U3O8 Corp. is a Canadian-based resource company that is focused on uranium and by-product commodities that are used elsewhere in the clean energy industry – vanadium, nickel and phosphate in the industrial battery space, and rare earths used in high-efficiency electric motor and generator industries.


We recognize that success in the cyclical resource industry depends on the quality of one’s assets – that bringing high production-cost deposits on-stream leads to over-supply that results in declining commodity prices and profitability problems for the high-cost producers. U3O8 Corp.’s focus, therefore, is on deposits that have low production-cost potential.

Laguna Salada Deposit in ArgentinaOur 100%-owned Laguna Salada Deposit in Argentina would have a cash cost of production of US$22 per pound of uranium, net of vanadium by-product credit

Berlin Deposit in ColombiaOur 100%-owned Berlin Deposit in Colombia would have a cash cost of production of almost zero per pound of uranium due to the value of the potential by-products.

Kurupung Deposit in GuyanaOur 100%-owned Kurupung Deposit in Guyana, based on internal preliminary estimates, is unlikely to be a low-cost uranium producer. While the Company is focused on the Laguna Salada & Berlin deposits, factors that could be game-changers for the Kurupung Deposit are growth in the size of the deposit to yield economies of scale, new separation technologies and the potential to produce zircon as a by-product. We see potential for growth to a very large deposit, but continued exploration is difficult to fund under the current weak market conditions.

   

News Sign-Up 


Thanks for signing up!


Join U3O8 Corp's mailing list to have the latest news and updates delivered straight to your inbox.






Email Address 
Sign Up
By submitting this form, you are granting: U3O8 Corp, 8 King Street East, Toronto, Ontario, M5C1B5, Canada,  permission to email you. You may unsubscribe via the link found at the bottom of every email.  (See our Email Privacy Policy for details.) Emails are serviced by Constant Contact.






Latest Press ReleasesU3O8 Corp.  Announces Terms of Financing Available to its Existing ShareholdersJune 27, 2017 - 9:00 amU3O8 Corp. Announces Results of Shareholder Meeting and Warrant CancellationJune 23, 2017 - 9:00 amU3O8 Corp. Reports Progress on Capital Restructuring / Director Warrant ExerciseJune 6, 2017 - 3:16 pmU3O8 Corp. Announces that David Marsh, a Metallurgist with Extensive Experience in the Design, Construction and Operation of Uranium Extraction Plants, is to Stand for Election as a DirectorMay 25, 2017 - 9:05 amFacebookTwitter 

























Scroll to top










Technical Reports – U3O8 Corp

























































Loading stock data... 


FacebookTwitterYoutubeLinkedin 







Technical ReportsNational Instruments NI 43-101 technical reports on U3O8 Corp’s projects.


Berlin Project, Colombia
January 31, 2013 – Berlin Project, Colombia – Preliminary Economic Assessment [download]
March 2, 2012 – Berlin Project, Colombia – Initial Resource Estimate [download]
Laguna Salada Project, Argentina
September 18, 2014 – Laguna Salada Project, Argentina – Preliminary Economic Assessment [download]
May 20, 2011 – Laguna Salada, Initial Resource Estimate [download]
March 23, 2010 – Geology and Uranium Mineralization of the Laguna Salada Project and Exploration Strategies of Earlier-Stage Properties [download]
Kurupung Project, Guyana
June 26, 2012 – Aricheng West and Aricheng C Uranium Deposits in the Kurupung Project [download]
January 14, 2009 – Aricheng North and Aricheng South Uranium Deposits in the Kurupung Project [download]

   

News Sign-Up 


Thanks for signing up!


Join U3O8 Corp's mailing list to have the latest news and updates delivered straight to your inbox.






Email Address 
Sign Up
By submitting this form, you are granting: U3O8 Corp, 8 King Street East, Toronto, Ontario, M5C1B5, Canada,  permission to email you. You may unsubscribe via the link found at the bottom of every email.  (See our Email Privacy Policy for details.) Emails are serviced by Constant Contact.






Latest Press ReleasesU3O8 Corp.  Announces Terms of Financing Available to its Existing ShareholdersJune 27, 2017 - 9:00 amU3O8 Corp. Announces Results of Shareholder Meeting and Warrant CancellationJune 23, 2017 - 9:00 amU3O8 Corp. Reports Progress on Capital Restructuring / Director Warrant ExerciseJune 6, 2017 - 3:16 pmU3O8 Corp. Announces that David Marsh, a Metallurgist with Extensive Experience in the Design, Construction and Operation of Uranium Extraction Plants, is to Stand for Election as a DirectorMay 25, 2017 - 9:05 amFacebookTwitter 

























Scroll to top










U3O8 Corp – The future of clean energy is here.


























































Loading stock data... 


FacebookTwitterYoutubeLinkedin 






Uranium
Uranium fuels reactors – a source of constant, carbon-free electricity
Energy Storage
Energy storage is the single biggest challenge and opportunity for renewable energy.
Phosphate
Phosphate is one of the three critical components of agricultural fertilizer – paving the way to feed the world
Renewable Energy
U3O8 is committed to the use of renewable energy.
Sustainable Development
Working with local communities to strike a balance between environmental stewardship and economic stimulation.

A Green Resources Company
U3O8 Corp. is a Canadian uranium company with South American projects focusing on low-cost production. We have uranium resources in Colombia, Argentina and Guyana showing positive metallurgical results.  A preliminary economic assessment shows our Berlin Deposit in Colombia has the potential to become a low-cash-cost uranium project due to by-product revenues from phosphate, nickel, rare earths (yttrium and neodymium).  Our Laguna Salada Deposit in Argentina is being advanced as a potential near-term, low-cost uranium producer.


Existing Shareholder Prospectus Exemption
The “Existing Shareholder Prospectus Exemption” has recently been adopted by the Toronto Stock Exchange (TSX) as a cost-effective way of making a financing available. The main prerequisite to participating in this type of financing is that you are a shareholder of the Company.

EXISTING SHAREHOLDER PROSPECTUS EXEMPTIONA simple, easy way to invest.



Latest Press Release
U3O8 Corp.  Announces Terms of Financing Available to its Existing ShareholdersJune 27, 2017Read more

http://www.u3o8corp.com/wp-content/uploads/2017/06/U3O8-Corp-Shareholders.jpg
540
720

Paul Gaudet

http://www.u3o8corp.com/wp-content/uploads/2015/11/u3o8-corp-logo-340x156-transparent.png

Paul Gaudet2017-06-27 09:00:592017-06-27 17:52:49U3O8 Corp.  Announces Terms of Financing Available to its Existing Shareholders

In The News
Michael Alkin's Perspective on the Future of UraniumJuly 18, 2017Read more

http://www.u3o8corp.com/wp-content/uploads/2017/07/Curzio-Research-Michael-Alkin-The-Art-Of-Short-Selling.jpg
720
960

Richard Spencer

http://www.u3o8corp.com/wp-content/uploads/2015/11/u3o8-corp-logo-340x156-transparent.png

Richard Spencer2017-07-18 11:05:562017-07-18 11:47:28Michael Alkin's Perspective on the Future of Uranium

Latest Article
Japan Brings 5th Nuclear Reactor Back into OperationJune 19, 2017Read more

http://www.u3o8corp.com/wp-content/uploads/2017/06/Japan-Nuclear-Regulatory-Authority.jpg
540
720

Paul Gaudet

http://www.u3o8corp.com/wp-content/uploads/2015/11/u3o8-corp-logo-340x156-transparent.png

Paul Gaudet2017-06-19 17:17:332017-06-19 17:26:48Japan Brings 5th Nuclear Reactor Back into Operation4th Japanese Nuclear Reactor Restarts, 5th Being Loaded with FuelMay 18, 2017Read more

http://www.u3o8corp.com/wp-content/uploads/2017/05/Japan-Takahama-Nuclear.jpg
540
720

Richard Spencer

http://www.u3o8corp.com/wp-content/uploads/2015/11/u3o8-corp-logo-340x156-transparent.png

Richard Spencer2017-05-18 12:55:112017-05-18 13:03:184th Japanese Nuclear Reactor Restarts, 5th Being Loaded with FuelPreviousNext

Events
Latin American Mining CumbreJuly 11, 2017Read more

http://www.u3o8corp.com/wp-content/uploads/2017/07/U3O8-Corp-Latin-America-Mining-Cumbre-Santiago-Chile.jpg
720
960

Paul Gaudet

http://www.u3o8corp.com/wp-content/uploads/2015/11/u3o8-corp-logo-340x156-transparent.png

Paul Gaudet2017-07-11 12:10:172017-07-18 12:02:40Latin American Mining Cumbre

Corporate Presentation

Download Presentation

 



















Scroll to top










Frac Sand – U3O8 Corp

























































Loading stock data... 


FacebookTwitterYoutubeLinkedin 







Frac SandThrough South American Silica Corp we have an opportunity for exposure to the Oil & Gas industry.


U3O8 Corp. holds a 39% interest in South American Silica Corp., a private company with silica sand properties in Argentina, Uruguay and southern Brazil.  These properties were selected on the basis of their sand quality and their reasonable transport distance to ports for potential export and access to development of Argentina’s giant Vaca Muerta shale oil and shale gas region.


The “disruptive technology” brought about by fracking turned the USA from declining oil production to an oil exporting nation in an astonishingly short period of 6 years (2009-2015).  Shale gas is displacing energy from coal-fired power stations and is therefore contributing to a reduction in green house gas emissions and pollution in general.
Argentina, which spent US$7 billion on oil imports in 2015, has an opportunity to emulate the USA’s success by developing the giant Vaca Muerta Formation which contains the world’s 3rd largest shale gas reserve and the 4th largest shale oil reserve.  Argentina has advantages over the USA’s shale hydrocarbon production: firstly, the USA’s production comes from at least 7 major basins that are distributed over the country, for which infrastructure needed to be developed.  Argentina’s reserves, in contrast, are contained mainly in one basin that already has extensive infrastructure from a century of conventional oil production.   And Argentina is benefiting from the latest technology used in other parts of the world by partnering with the who’s who of international oil producers including Chevron, ExxonMobil, Dow Chemical, Total, Wintershal, BP, Petronas, Sinopec, China National Petroleum Corporation, Gazprom and Petrobras.

Argentina has the potential to become the energy powerhouse of South America through the development of its vast shale gas and oil reserves as well as with low-carbon nuclear and renewable energy from its world-class solar resources in the Atacama Desert in the north and the enviable wind resources of the Patagonian region in the south.
South American Silica Corp.’s properties in Argentina, Uruguay and southern Brazil contain sand that meets and exceeds the requirements laid out by the American Petroleum Institute. The sands in Uruguay and Brazil would be amenable to hydro-mining, one of the most cost-effective mining methods that has a minimal environmental impact.  Scoping work by management has led to the conclusion that all-in transport costs to a deepwater port and to the Nuequen Basin in which the Vaca Muerta resource is located, are reasonable.  Having cleared these critical hurdles, the next step is to establish the consistency of quality of the sands through formal resource estimation when funds are available at less dilutive levels. 


Download South American Silica Corp’s Corporate Presentation

   

News Sign-Up 


Thanks for signing up!


Join U3O8 Corp's mailing list to have the latest news and updates delivered straight to your inbox.






Email Address 
Sign Up
By submitting this form, you are granting: U3O8 Corp, 8 King Street East, Toronto, Ontario, M5C1B5, Canada,  permission to email you. You may unsubscribe via the link found at the bottom of every email.  (See our Email Privacy Policy for details.) Emails are serviced by Constant Contact.






Latest Press ReleasesU3O8 Corp.  Announces Terms of Financing Available to its Existing ShareholdersJune 27, 2017 - 9:00 amU3O8 Corp. Announces Results of Shareholder Meeting and Warrant CancellationJune 23, 2017 - 9:00 amU3O8 Corp. Reports Progress on Capital Restructuring / Director Warrant ExerciseJune 6, 2017 - 3:16 pmU3O8 Corp. Announces that David Marsh, a Metallurgist with Extensive Experience in the Design, Construction and Operation of Uranium Extraction Plants, is to Stand for Election as a DirectorMay 25, 2017 - 9:05 amFacebookTwitter 

























Scroll to top



U3O8 Corp. Enhances its Battery Commodity Focus by Joining Vanitec - the Only Global Vanadium Organization - to Provide Access to Battery Research and DevelopmentHomeMailFlickrTumblrNewsSportsFinanceCelebrityAnswersGroupsMobileMoreTry Yahoo Finance on Firefox »YahooSearchSearchSign inU.S. Markets closedS&P 5002,472.10-3.32 (-0.13%)Dow 3021,830.31+33.76 (+0.15%)Nasdaq6,374.68-7.51 (-0.12%)LISTENWho is the face of pro baseball?Yahoo Finance's Dan Roberts and Myles Udland debate the business of baseballU3O8 Corp. Enhances its Battery Commodity Focus by Joining Vanitec - the Only Global Vanadium Organization - to Provide Access to Battery Research and DevelopmentPR NewswireFebruary 23, 2017ReblogShareTweetShareTORONTO, Feb. 23, 2017 /CNW/ - U3O8 Corp. (TSX: UWE), (UWEFF) ("U3O8 Corp." or the "Company") announces that it has become an associate member of Vanitec Limited ("Vanitec").  Vanitec brings together research organizations and manufacturers of products that contain vanadium, with companies involved in the mining and processing of the metal.  The use of vanadium in batteries is growing exponentially, not only for industrial-scale Vanadium Redox Flow Batteries ("VRB"), but also for lithium ion batteries.  U3O8 Corp. also has phosphate and nickel resources – commodities that are in demand by the battery industry."One of the greatest challenges and opportunities related with renewable energy from solar or wind is its inherent supply variability that needs to be regulated or smoothed in order to be a useful source of electricity," said Dr Richard Spencer, President and CEO of U3O8 Corp.  "Batteries perform this function, acting like shock-absorbers, storing energy when an excess is produced, and delivering electricity when demand rises.  Lithium-ion batteries are ideal for high power output for a few hours, but when power is needed for longer periods, other technologies, such as flow batteries, provide a better alternative.  Vanadium Redox Flow Batteries are a superior alternative when power is needed for more than four hours – and these batteries can easily and cost-effectively be scaled up for industrial applications.  With its vanadium resources of 63 million pounds indicated and 118 million pounds inferred, U3O8 Corp. represents a potential supplier to the battery industry.  Vanitec provides a forum in which we may forge closer ties with battery manufacturers as well as research facilities that are working on ways of making the batteries more efficient and cost-effective.  This is an exciting time since, after years of weakening markets, the vanadium price has rebounded sharply in response to increased demand."U3O8 Corp.'s Vanadium ResourcesU3O8 Corp. has a significant vanadium resource of 63 million pounds indicated and 118 million pounds inferred in its Berlin and Laguna Salada deposits.  Vanadium would potentially be produced as a by-product in both deposits, constituting approximately 14% of revenue from the Laguna Salada Deposit1 and approximately 9% from Berlin2.  At Laguna Salada, the removal of pebbles by screening results in the uranium and vanadium being concentrated into the fine-grained component of the mineralized gravel.  Test work has shown that beneficiation by screening results in vanadium grades increasing over four times in the fine-grained material compared with the gravel's in situ grade1.Table 1.  Summary of U3O8 Corp.'s NI 43-101 vanadium resources (source: Preliminary Economic Assessments on the Berlin and Laguna Salada deposits3,4).  Vanadium Resources     Deposit    NI 43-101 Resource Classification   Tonnes (million)   Grade V2O5    Beneficiated Grade   Contained V2O5(Mlb)     Berlin, Colombia   Indicated   0.6   0.4%   -   6.0     Inferred   8.1   0.5%   -   91.0             Laguna Salada, Argentina   Indicated   47.3   0.06%   0.24%   57.1     Inferred   20.8   0.06%   0.24%   26.9   Vanadium in BatteriesVanadium is used in flow batteries as well as some lithium ion types.Flow Batteries: Vanadium Redox Flow Batteries ("VRBs") provide utility- or industrial– scale electrical storage capacity.  The battery consists essentially of two tanks of vanadium electrolyte separated by a membrane.  Its capacity to store energy can easily be scaled by increasing the size of the tanks.  Vanadium represents 35-40% of the cost of VRBs.What really sets these batteries apart is that they can be charged and discharged over and over again without degradation or significant loss of capacity.  Large VRBs with a megawatt capacity have been through over 200,000 charge-discharge cycles, equivalent to over 250 years of operation assuming one charge-discharge cycle per day, with no significant degradation of the electrolyte.  The operating life of VRBs is considered to be around 20 years because of gradual degradation of the membrane; the actual vanadium electrolyte does not degrade and can be recycled into a new battery.  In contrast, most long-lived lithium ion batteries last up to 10,000 charge-discharge cycles – and have a maximum life of about seven years. As a result of the charged ions being in a liquid, VRBs charge in a very short time, and conversely, the stored energy can be released almost instantaneously when required.  VRBs also have excellent charge retention; they can be left for up to a year and still retain 98% of their charge.  New generation VRBs operate efficiently over a wide temperature range of -40°C to +50°C.  VRBs are also non-flammable.  Read MoreThe energy capacity of current VRB models is relatively low (Figure 1).  This means that for a given amount of energy storage, a VRB will be significantly larger than a lithium ion battery. Ongoing development is focused on increasing the energy capacity of VRBs and the most recent work shows that the addition of phosphate to the electrolyte doubles its energy capacity. The up-front cost of a VRB is currently more than double that of a lithium ion battery system of similar energy storage capacity.  This is counterbalanced by two things:  longer battery life (20 years for a VRB versus 7 years for a lithium ion battery), and the fact that the VRB electrolyte can be reused indefinitely in new batteries.Lithium Vanadium Phosphate Batteries:Lithium vanadium phosphate ("LVP") batteries are attracting attention because of their higher energy capacity (their capacity to store a large amount of energy for their weight).  LVPs have an energy capacity almost double that of other mainstream lithium ion batteries (490Wh/kg versus 200Wh/kg for lithium cobalt oxide ("LCO") and 250Wh/kg for lithium nickel cobalt aluminium oxide ("NCA") batteries – Figure 1).  LVPs also have a slightly higher voltage (3.8V) in comparison to the 3.6V of the LCO and NCA batteries, which allows for faster acceleration in electric vehicles.  The greater thermal and electrochemical stability of phosphate also makes the batteries safer than many other types of lithium ion battery. Japan's GS Yuasa Corp., which has joint ventures with Mitsubishi and Honda, is manufacturing LVP batteries, as is Valence Technology Inc. in the USA.  BYD, a large Chinese battery manufacturer, is currently producing a lithium iron phosphate ("LFP") battery for the electric bus market that it's concentrating on, but is reported to be evaluating the LVP battery.  LVP is also the battery of choice for Subaru's G4e electric car. The growing attractiveness of phosphate in batteries is extremely interesting to U3O8 Corp. because of the phosphate resource in its Berlin Deposit in Colombia (Table 2).   Originally the Company had considered the phosphate in terms of the agricultural fertilizer market only, but the emergence of phosphate as a key component of batteries is driving the Company to focus more on the battery market, especially since the Berlin Deposit also contains a resource of nickel, another commodity used in some lithium ion batteries. Table 2.  U3O8 Corp.'s NI 43-101 phosphate and nickel resource in the Berlin Deposit4.  Other Battery Commodity Resources, Berlin Deposit      NI 43-101 Resource Classification   Tonnes (million)   Phosphate   Nickel     Grade P2O5    Contained P2O5(tonnes)   Grade Nickel   Contained Nickel (Mlbs)     Indicated   0.6   8.4%   50,000   0.2%   3.1     Inferred   8.1   9.4%   800,000   0.2%   42.1   Vanadium Market & OutlookThe vanadium market is predicted to slip into deficit later this year, with demand outstripping supply for the foreseeable future (Figure 2).  Prices have reacted by rising sharply after almost a decade of decline (Figure 3). Over 90% of current vanadium demand is from the steel industry, and is growing at a steady rate of 3%-4% per year.   Demand is driven by vanadium-steel having one of the highest strength to weight ratios of any steel alloy.  Adding only 2 pounds of vanadium to a tonne of steel doubles its strength, and rebar made from vanadium steel alloy is a key component to improving the resistance of buildings to earthquakes.Demand for vanadium from the battery industry is starting to grow exponentially; batteries are expected to make up 25% of vanadium demand in 2020 from 6% in 2016 (Figure 2). Technical InformationDr. Richard Spencer, P.Geo., C.Geol., President and CEO of U3O8 Corp. and a Qualified Person as defined by National Instrument 43-101, has approved the technical information in this news release relating to the Laguna Salada Deposit and the related PEA.About U3O8 Corp.U3O8 Corp. is focused on exploration and development of deposits of uranium and associated commodities in South America.  Potential by-products from uranium production include commodities used in the energy storage industry – in the manufacture of batteries - such as nickel, vanadium and phosphate.  The Company's mineral resources estimates were made in accordance with National Instrument 43-101, and are contained in three deposits: Laguna Salada Deposit, Argentina – a PEA shows this near surface, free-digging uranium - vanadium deposit has low production-cost potential;Berlin Deposit, Colombia – a PEA shows that Berlin also has low-cost uranium production potential due to revenue that would be generated from by-products of phosphate, vanadium, nickel, rare earths (yttrium and neodymium) and other metals that occur within the deposit; andKurupung Deposit, Guyana – a uranium resource has been estimated in four veins within a uranium-zirconium vein system. Resources have been estimated on four veins, while consistent mineralization of the same type has been intersected in scout drilling of an additional six veins, while yet other veins require first-time exploration drilling.Information on U3O8 Corp., its resources and technical reports are available at www.u3o8corp.com and on SEDAR at www.sedar.com.  Follow U3O8 Corp. on Facebook:  www.facebook.com/u3o8corp, Twitter:  www.twitter.com/u3o8corp and Youtube: www.youtube.com/u3o8corp.Forward-Looking StatementsThis news release includes certain "forward looking statements" related with the development plans, economic potential and growth targets of U3O8 Corp's projects. Forward-looking statements consist of statements that are not purely historical, including statements regarding beliefs, plans, expectations or intensions for the future, and include, but not limited to, statements with respect to: (a) the low-cost and near-term development of Laguna Salada, (b) the Laguna Salada and Berlin PEAs, (c) the potential of the Kurupung district in Guyana, (d) impact of the U- pgradeTM process on expected capital and operating expenditures, and (e) the price and market for uranium. These statements are based on assumptions, including that: (i) actual results of our exploration, resource goals, metallurgical testing, economic studies and development activities will continue to be positive and proceed as planned, and assumptions in the Laguna Salada and Berlin PEAs prove to be accurate, (ii) a joint venture will be formed with the provincial petroleum and mining company on the Argentina project, (iii) requisite regulatory and governmental approvals will be received on a timely basis on terms acceptable to U3O8 Corp., (iv) economic, political and industry market conditions will be favourable, and (v) financial markets and the market for uranium will improve for junior resource companies in the short-term. Such statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results, performance or developments to differ materially from those contained in such statements, including, but not limited to: (1) changes in general economic and financial market conditions, (2) changes in demand and prices for minerals, (3) the Company's ability to establish appropriate joint venture partnerships, (4) litigation, regulatory, and legislative developments, dependence on regulatory approvals, and changes in environmental compliance requirements, community support and the political and economic climate, (5) the inherent uncertainties and speculative nature associated with exploration results, resource estimates, potential resource growth, future metallurgical test results, changes in project parameters as plans evolve, (6) competitive developments, (7) availability of future financing, (8) exploration risks, and other factors beyond the control of U3O8 Corp. including those factors set out in the "Risk Factors" in our Annual Information Form available on SEDAR at www.sedar.com. Readers are cautioned that the assumptions used in the preparation of such information, although considered reasonable at the time of preparation, may prove to be imprecise and, as such, undue reliance should not be placed on forward-looking statements. U3O8 Corp. assumes no obligation to update such information, except as may be required by law. For more information on the above-noted PEAs, refer to the September 18, 2014 technical report titled "Preliminary Economic Assessment of the Laguna Salada Uranium-Vanadium Deposit, Chubut Province, Argentina" and the January 18, 2013 technical report titled "U3O8 Corp. Preliminary Economic Assessment on the Berlin Deposit, Colombia."___________________________________ 1 September 18, 2014 Technical Report:  "Preliminary Economic Assessment of the Laguna Salada Uranium Vanadium Deposit, Chubut Province, Argentina.2 January 18, 2013 technical report:  "Berlin Project, Colombia – Preliminary Economic Assessment, NI 43-101 Report."3 May 20, 2011:  "Laguna Salada Project, Chubut Province, Argentina, NI 43-101 Technical Report on Laguna Salada:  Initial Resource Estimate".    4 March 2, 2012:  "Berlin Project, Colombia – National Instrument NI 43-101 Report".ReblogShareTweetShareRecently ViewedYour list is empty.What to Read NextElectric-car battery progress: incremental improvements, not revolutionary leapsGreen Car ReportsThis Will Be In Everyone's Household By 2020Banyan HillSponsoredHitler exhibition in Berlin bunker asks: How could it happen?ReutersBerlin orders recall of 22,000 Porsches over emissions cheatingAFPThe 'two pizza rule' is a secret to productive meetings that helped Amazon CEO Jeff Bezos become one of the world's richest menBusiness InsiderEngineer Finds Pattern; Makes Millions in StocksMoney MorningSponsoredHere are the US targets North Korea most likely wants to nukeBusiness InsiderTrump to cops: 'Please don't be too nice' while arresting 'thugs,' and don't worry about their heads when you toss them in the 'paddy wagon'Business InsiderOil takes a breather after rallying to 8-week highsInvesting.comDiscover it: 4.8 out of 5 avg. by 24K+ customersDiscover CardSponsoredChevron and Exxon Mobil have a tough path ahead: NYSE traderYahoo Finance VideoStocks mixed after heavy earnings weekWells Fargo faces angry questions after new sales abuses uncoveredReutersTrunk Club. Making Sense of Style.Trunk ClubSponsoredAPNewsBreak: Yellowstone park cracks down on sex harassmentAssociated PressThe real reason overseas manufacturing is coming to AmericaYahoo FinancePutin critic says Russian lawyer's Trump Tower meeting was about sanctionsGreg: A lawyer, a spy, a mob boss, and a money launder walk into a bar. The bartender says: "you guys must be here to talk about adoption."Join the Conversation1 / 5801








U3O8 Corp. Defines the Full Extraction Process for Its Berlin Deposit in ColombiaHomeMailFlickrTumblrNewsSportsFinanceCelebrityAnswersGroupsMobileMoreYahooSearchSearchSkip to NavigationSkip to Main ContentSkip to Related Content0U3O8 Corp. Defines the Full Extraction Process for Its Berlin Deposit in ColombiaMarketwire•November 1, 2012TORONTO, ONTARIO--(Marketwire - Nov 1, 2012) -  U3O8 Corp. (TSX:UWE)(UWEFF), a Canadian-based company focused on exploration and resource expansion of uranium and associated commodities in South America, outlines the final component of the three main sections of the flow sheet that defines the entire process by which uranium, phosphate, vanadium, rare earths and other metals are to be extracted from the Berlin Project in Colombia. This flow sheet is an integral part of the preliminary economic assessment ("PEA") being undertaken by Bateman Engineering N.V., which is on track for delivery by the end of 2012. "The flow sheet marks another key achievement by demonstrating how we plan to extract the various commodities from the Berlin ore into saleable products," said Dr. Richard Spencer, U3O8 Corp''s President and CEO. "U3O8 Corp. has made huge strides in advancing the Berlin Project from exploration trenching and resource estimation to development of the entire flow sheet and finalizing the upcoming PEA in just two and a half years. Berlin is fast becoming a company maker that we are showing could be a large deposit and low-cost uranium producer thanks to the value of a suite of recoverable by-products."Flow Sheet for the Berlin ProjectThe process route shown in the flow sheet has been designed to efficiently extract multiple commodities from Berlin, to be versatile in terms of reagent consumption, to be compatible with standard recovery methods and to create an environmentally benign tailing. U3O8 Corp. has now defined the three main components of this process as follows (Figure 1):Beneficiation of the crushed ore using acetic acid (vinegar) to remove calcite and concentrate the valuable commodities into as small a mass as possible, which makes the subsequent extraction and recovery processes more efficient and reduces capital and operating costs;Extraction of the various commodities into a pregnant solution by an acidic ferric iron leach method; andRecovery of the individual elements from the pregnant solution by conventional techniques - details reported in this press release. Beneficiation:As reported in U3O8 Corp''s October 17, 2012 press release, beneficiation using a weak solution of acetic acid to dissolve calcite from the mineralized material at Berlin concentrated the payable elements into 40-47% of the original ore mass as well as producing a potentially saleable gypsum by-product. The significant reduction in volume of material that undergoes further treatment may reduce processing and capital costs, simplify the extraction process, add a potentially valuable by-product and decrease the volume of tailings by 50-60%. The PEA is considering both acetic acid and non-acetic acid routes to determine which of these options is most beneficial for the Berlin Project. Arafura Resources Ltd. has stated that it plans to use a similar process of adding sulphuric acid to regenerate hydrochloric acid, which could produce a gypsum by-product at its Nolans Bore deposit in Australia.Extraction:The residue of the ore that remains after beneficiation by acetic acid is subjected to a two-step ferric iron process as detailed in U3O8 Corp''s January 12, 2012 press release. The ferric leach achieved excellent extraction of multiple elements contained in the mineralized rock from the Berlin Project. These results are considered to be representative of the entire resource area since the test work was conducted on 35% of the bore hole intersections that were included in the resource estimate. U3O8 Corp''s ferric process was adapted from proven technology used for uranium and yttrium production at Elliott Lake in Ontario and is now used at Rossing Mine in Namibia and the Talvivaara Mine in Finland. Step one of the extraction process involves the mineralized residue being mixed with ferric iron and sulphuric acid, followed by step two - a wash with weak sulphuric acid. These two steps will be combined in a conventional train of reactors to ensure efficient extraction of the soluble metals and phosphate into the pregnant liquor.Recovery: The beneficiation and extractive leach sections of the process have been designed to create a pregnant liquor solution ("PLS") that contains the metals of economic interest and phosphate at a concentration appropriate for conventional recovery techniques and to minimize the presence of elements such as calcium and iron that can complicate the recovery process. After beneficiation of the Berlin ore with acetic acid, the acidic ferric leach would generate a PLS with an approximate concentration of elements as follows: uranium - 600 milligrams per litre ("mg/L"); phosphorous - 27,000 mg/L; vanadium - 1,400 mg/L; rare earths including yttrium - 200 mg/L and neodymium - 45 mg/L; molybdenum 180 mg/L; nickel 850 mg/L; zinc 1,800 mg/L and manganese 75 mg/L.Calcium levels are managed in two ways: through the extraction of most of the calcium from the ore in the beneficiation step; and secondly, by maintaining the residual calcium in the PLS in a relatively insoluble form. Had hydrochloric acid been used instead, chlorine would have been introduced into the system which, together with calcium, would have interfered with extraction of the metals of value. The first step in the recovery process involves the alteration of ferric iron in the liquor to the ferrous form in a process called reduction. Iron in the ferrous state can be carried in the PLS through the remainder of the process without interfering significantly with standard ion exchange ("IX") and solvent extraction ("SX") or direct precipitation routines used for select recovery of the valuable elements. Iron reduction can be readily achieved with the addition of a variety of reducing reagents. Molybdenum is the first element to be selectively extracted from the PLS in the first IX process and is stripped using ammonium hydroxide (to prevent gypsum co-precipitation with the molybdenum) and is precipitated as calcium molybdate, a saleable product. The removal of molybdenum before uranium and vanadium extraction is to prevent interference in the subsequent IX and SX processes designed to extract other elements. Uranium and vanadium are then extracted from the PLS in a second IX process into a combined stream using weak sulphuric acid. The uranium is separated from vanadium by adding hydrogen peroxide which causes precipitation of uranium peroxide. The uranium peroxide (UO4.nH2O) is thickened, centrifuged and dried for transport off-site. The uranium peroxide is subsequently heated to form yellowcake (U3O8), the form in which uranium is marketed. The vanadium is then precipitated with ammonia to produce ammonium penta-vanadate, which is thickened, centrifuged and dried for transport off-site. This process of extracting the uranium and vanadium together, and then separating them, is used in the following facilities: Climax Uranium Co. (USA), Talvivaara Mining Co. (Finland) and Smith Ranch project (USA).Following the extraction of molybdenum, uranium and vanadium, the PLS undergoes the first SX process to produce an estimated 25% strength phosphoric acid by extracting phosphorous with tri-butyl phosphate ("TBP") in a ShellSol diluent followed by stripping with water. The resulting phosphoric acid is concentrated to a minimum 83% strength by a steam evaporator to produce a saleable phosphoric acid product.The rare earths (principally yttrium, neodymium and cerium) are precipitated by elevating the pH level of the PLS with ammonia to produce a precipitate which is centrifuged and dried and then the mixed rare earth oxides are packed for transport and separation off-site. The PLS now contains only base metals and manganese for recovery and undergoes the second SX process for the extraction and stripping of a mixture of nickel, zinc and manganese with D2EHPA (Di-(2-ethylhexyl) phosphoric acid) and sulphuric acid. The individual metals could then be separated from the mixture on-site, or the mixture could be sent off-site for further processing. At the end of the recovery process, the ferrous iron contained in solution could be oxidized to the ferric iron form and recycled back into the ferric leach circuit to lower reagent consumption and reduce operating costs. Qualified Persons and AccreditationThe metallurgical test work relied upon for the development of the flow sheet was done at SGS Lakefield OreTest Pty Ltd in Perth, Australia. SGS Lakefield OreTest was established as a metallurgical services company in 1993 as Lakefield OreTest Pty Limited and is now a subsidiary of the SGS Lakefield group, which has been offering mineral processing services to the mining industry since 1948.Dr. Paul Miller, a qualified person as defined in National Instrument 43-101 of the Canadian Securities Administrators ("QP"), has overseen the metallurgical test work carried out by SGS Lakefield OreTest, and verified the technical information relating to the results reported above. Dr. Miller is a metallurgist specializing in hydrometallurgy with over 30 years'' experience in the commercial application of processes for the treatment of sulphide-bearing ore. Dr. Miller has a doctorate in Chemical Engineering, is a member of the Institute of Mining and Metallurgy, London, and is a Chartered Engineer. He is Managing Director of Sulphide Resource Processing Pty Ltd.Bateman Engineering N.V. is part of the Tenova Mining & Minerals Group, a leading, international engineering firm ("Bateman"). Bateman has been providing process design, development and construction services to the resource sector for over 90 years with extensive and specific process and engineering experience in the extraction of uranium, phosphate, rare earths, nickel and zinc as well as in sulphuric acid production. U3O8 Corp. selected Bateman to conduct a PEA on the Berlin deposit because of its extensive expertise in these critical elements relevant to Berlin. In coordination with Dr. Miller and U3O8 Corp., Bateman has been instrumental in developing the flow sheet, which has been overseen by Mr. Pieter Niemann, a Bateman employee and a QP. Mr. Niemann, a Professional Metallurgical Engineer and MBA graduate, has relied on geological information relating to the Berlin deposit from U3O8 Corp. and on metallurgical test work carried out by SGS Lakefield OreTest. Mr. Niemann has verified the content related to the flow sheet presented in this press release.Dr. Richard Spencer, P. Geo., President & CEO of U3O8 Corp. and a QP, has supervised the preparation of, and verified the technical information contained in this press release relating to the Berlin Project.About U3O8 Corp.U3O8 Corp. is an advanced exploration company focused on exploration and resource expansion of uranium and associated commodities in South America - a promising new frontier for uranium exploration and development. In just one year, U3O8 Corp''s uranium resources have grown 7-fold with deposits now in Colombia, Argentina and Guyana comprising of:- Berlin Project, Colombia - its flagship property contains a uranium deposit with a high-value suite of by-products including phosphate, vanadium, rare earths (yttrium and neodymium) and other metals;- Laguna Salada Project, Argentina - a near surface, free-digging uranium, vanadium deposit that is potentially amenable to low-cost mining and processing methods; and- Kurupung Project, Guyana - an initial uranium deposit in a large emerging uranium district.Positive metallurgical results have been achieved on all three projects. U3O8 Corp''s near-term focus is scout drilling in Colombia to drive resource growth and completion of a preliminary economic assessment by the end of 2012 to broadly estimate capital and operating costs on the initial multi-commodity resource defined at Berlin. Additional information on U3O8 Corp. and its mineral resources are available at www.u3o8corp.com.Forward-Looking StatementsCertain information set forth in this news release may contain forward-looking statements that involve substantial known and unknown risks and uncertainties. These forward-looking statements are subject to numerous risks and uncertainties, certain of which are beyond the control of U3O8 Corp., including, but not limited to, the future results of metallurgical test work, whether results of metallurgical test work on a smaller scale to date can be duplicated on a larger scale, the impact of general economic conditions, industry conditions, the timing of laboratory results and preparation of technical reports and PEAs, the actual results of independent scoping studies and subsequent metallurgical testing, volatility of commodity prices, risks associated with the uncertainty of exploration results and estimates and that the resource potential will be achieved on the Berlin Project and other exploration projects, currency fluctuations, legislative change, dependence upon regulatory approvals, and the uncertainty of obtaining additional financing and exploration risk. Readers are cautioned that the assumptions used in the preparation of such information, although considered reasonable at the time of preparation, may prove to be imprecise and, as such, undue reliance should not be placed on forward-looking statements.To view Figure 1, please visit the following link: http://media3.marketwire.com/docs/uweff1101fig1.pdf.To view the videos associated with this press release, please visit the following links:www.youtube.com/watch?v=tw-kAT7kj3owww.youtube.com/watch?v=lMjQ5oWUeMQPopular in the CommunityStudy disproves the Bible's suggestion that the ancient Canaanites were wiped out2,734 reactions5%66%29%Trunk Club. Making Sense of Style.Trunk ClubSponsored‘New York City Up and Down’ — 4 decades through the lens of photojournalist Jean-Pierre Laffont14 reactions16%68%16%Trump replaces chief of staff Reince Priebus with homeland security chief John Kelly9,144 reactions5%71%24%Man says he killed wife aboard cruise ship because 'she would not stop laughing at me': Affidavit4,088 reactions4%73%23%Discover it: 4.8 out of 5 avg. by 24K+ customersDiscover CardSponsoredSyria's unexploded cluster bombs7 reactions6%61%33%Republicans' bid to repeal Obamacare ends with a surprise7 reactions0%80%20%Luis Fonsi On Justin Bieber's Spanish, 'Despacito' Hitting No. 1534 reactions3%80%17%What's the Problem with Joel Osteen?ChurchLeaders.comSponsoredLive Stream the Panorama NYC Festival Now on Yahoo Music!6 reactions0%67%33%Border officers appeared to encourage teen to drink from bottle containing liquid meth2,863 reactions4%65%31%George Clooney Warns Paparazzi ‘Will Be Prosecuted’ for Intrusive Twins Pics1,214 reactions4%70%26%Engineer Finds Pattern; Makes Millions in StocksMoney MorningSponsoredProtesters across the country oppose GOP's health care plan2,392 reactions3%72%25%Inside the latest White House staff wars6 reactions20%40%40%Historic Pearl River Mart Reopens to Bring 'Cross-Cultural Joy' to NYC215 reactions8%69%23%This Is Why You Don't Mess With ChinaHistoryInOrbitSponsoredReports: 6 teams make offers for Kyrie Irving, who 'very badly wants' to join Knicks292 reactions4%81%15%N. Korea leader says 'all US' within range after missile test26 reactions7%68%25%North Korea says 2nd ICBM test puts much of US in range4,798 reactions4%73%23%Life In N. Korea Is Not What You Would Think It IsKiwi ReportSponsoredDozens injured in Barcelona commuter train crash23 reactions3%83%14%North Korea's latest missile launch splashes down in the Sea of Japan4 reactions34%33%33%








U3O8 Corp. Enhances its Battery Commodity Focus by Joining Vanitec - the Only Global Vanadium Organization - to Provide Access to Battery Research and DevelopmentHomeMailFlickrTumblrNewsSportsFinanceCelebrityAnswersGroupsMobileMoreTry Yahoo Finance on Firefox »YahooSearchSearchSign inU.S. Markets closedS&P 5002,472.10-3.32 (-0.13%)Dow 3021,830.31+33.76 (+0.15%)Nasdaq6,374.68-7.51 (-0.12%)LISTENWho is the face of pro baseball?Yahoo Finance's Dan Roberts and Myles Udland debate the business of baseballU3O8 Corp. Enhances its Battery Commodity Focus by Joining Vanitec - the Only Global Vanadium Organization - to Provide Access to Battery Research and DevelopmentPR NewswireFebruary 23, 2017ReblogShareTweetShareTORONTO, Feb. 23, 2017 /CNW/ - U3O8 Corp. (TSX: UWE), (UWEFF) ("U3O8 Corp." or the "Company") announces that it has become an associate member of Vanitec Limited ("Vanitec").  Vanitec brings together research organizations and manufacturers of products that contain vanadium, with companies involved in the mining and processing of the metal.  The use of vanadium in batteries is growing exponentially, not only for industrial-scale Vanadium Redox Flow Batteries ("VRB"), but also for lithium ion batteries.  U3O8 Corp. also has phosphate and nickel resources – commodities that are in demand by the battery industry."One of the greatest challenges and opportunities related with renewable energy from solar or wind is its inherent supply variability that needs to be regulated or smoothed in order to be a useful source of electricity," said Dr Richard Spencer, President and CEO of U3O8 Corp.  "Batteries perform this function, acting like shock-absorbers, storing energy when an excess is produced, and delivering electricity when demand rises.  Lithium-ion batteries are ideal for high power output for a few hours, but when power is needed for longer periods, other technologies, such as flow batteries, provide a better alternative.  Vanadium Redox Flow Batteries are a superior alternative when power is needed for more than four hours – and these batteries can easily and cost-effectively be scaled up for industrial applications.  With its vanadium resources of 63 million pounds indicated and 118 million pounds inferred, U3O8 Corp. represents a potential supplier to the battery industry.  Vanitec provides a forum in which we may forge closer ties with battery manufacturers as well as research facilities that are working on ways of making the batteries more efficient and cost-effective.  This is an exciting time since, after years of weakening markets, the vanadium price has rebounded sharply in response to increased demand."U3O8 Corp.'s Vanadium ResourcesU3O8 Corp. has a significant vanadium resource of 63 million pounds indicated and 118 million pounds inferred in its Berlin and Laguna Salada deposits.  Vanadium would potentially be produced as a by-product in both deposits, constituting approximately 14% of revenue from the Laguna Salada Deposit1 and approximately 9% from Berlin2.  At Laguna Salada, the removal of pebbles by screening results in the uranium and vanadium being concentrated into the fine-grained component of the mineralized gravel.  Test work has shown that beneficiation by screening results in vanadium grades increasing over four times in the fine-grained material compared with the gravel's in situ grade1.Table 1.  Summary of U3O8 Corp.'s NI 43-101 vanadium resources (source: Preliminary Economic Assessments on the Berlin and Laguna Salada deposits3,4).  Vanadium Resources     Deposit    NI 43-101 Resource Classification   Tonnes (million)   Grade V2O5    Beneficiated Grade   Contained V2O5(Mlb)     Berlin, Colombia   Indicated   0.6   0.4%   -   6.0     Inferred   8.1   0.5%   -   91.0             Laguna Salada, Argentina   Indicated   47.3   0.06%   0.24%   57.1     Inferred   20.8   0.06%   0.24%   26.9   Vanadium in BatteriesVanadium is used in flow batteries as well as some lithium ion types.Flow Batteries: Vanadium Redox Flow Batteries ("VRBs") provide utility- or industrial– scale electrical storage capacity.  The battery consists essentially of two tanks of vanadium electrolyte separated by a membrane.  Its capacity to store energy can easily be scaled by increasing the size of the tanks.  Vanadium represents 35-40% of the cost of VRBs.What really sets these batteries apart is that they can be charged and discharged over and over again without degradation or significant loss of capacity.  Large VRBs with a megawatt capacity have been through over 200,000 charge-discharge cycles, equivalent to over 250 years of operation assuming one charge-discharge cycle per day, with no significant degradation of the electrolyte.  The operating life of VRBs is considered to be around 20 years because of gradual degradation of the membrane; the actual vanadium electrolyte does not degrade and can be recycled into a new battery.  In contrast, most long-lived lithium ion batteries last up to 10,000 charge-discharge cycles – and have a maximum life of about seven years. As a result of the charged ions being in a liquid, VRBs charge in a very short time, and conversely, the stored energy can be released almost instantaneously when required.  VRBs also have excellent charge retention; they can be left for up to a year and still retain 98% of their charge.  New generation VRBs operate efficiently over a wide temperature range of -40°C to +50°C.  VRBs are also non-flammable.  Read MoreThe energy capacity of current VRB models is relatively low (Figure 1).  This means that for a given amount of energy storage, a VRB will be significantly larger than a lithium ion battery. Ongoing development is focused on increasing the energy capacity of VRBs and the most recent work shows that the addition of phosphate to the electrolyte doubles its energy capacity. The up-front cost of a VRB is currently more than double that of a lithium ion battery system of similar energy storage capacity.  This is counterbalanced by two things:  longer battery life (20 years for a VRB versus 7 years for a lithium ion battery), and the fact that the VRB electrolyte can be reused indefinitely in new batteries.Lithium Vanadium Phosphate Batteries:Lithium vanadium phosphate ("LVP") batteries are attracting attention because of their higher energy capacity (their capacity to store a large amount of energy for their weight).  LVPs have an energy capacity almost double that of other mainstream lithium ion batteries (490Wh/kg versus 200Wh/kg for lithium cobalt oxide ("LCO") and 250Wh/kg for lithium nickel cobalt aluminium oxide ("NCA") batteries – Figure 1).  LVPs also have a slightly higher voltage (3.8V) in comparison to the 3.6V of the LCO and NCA batteries, which allows for faster acceleration in electric vehicles.  The greater thermal and electrochemical stability of phosphate also makes the batteries safer than many other types of lithium ion battery. Japan's GS Yuasa Corp., which has joint ventures with Mitsubishi and Honda, is manufacturing LVP batteries, as is Valence Technology Inc. in the USA.  BYD, a large Chinese battery manufacturer, is currently producing a lithium iron phosphate ("LFP") battery for the electric bus market that it's concentrating on, but is reported to be evaluating the LVP battery.  LVP is also the battery of choice for Subaru's G4e electric car. The growing attractiveness of phosphate in batteries is extremely interesting to U3O8 Corp. because of the phosphate resource in its Berlin Deposit in Colombia (Table 2).   Originally the Company had considered the phosphate in terms of the agricultural fertilizer market only, but the emergence of phosphate as a key component of batteries is driving the Company to focus more on the battery market, especially since the Berlin Deposit also contains a resource of nickel, another commodity used in some lithium ion batteries. Table 2.  U3O8 Corp.'s NI 43-101 phosphate and nickel resource in the Berlin Deposit4.  Other Battery Commodity Resources, Berlin Deposit      NI 43-101 Resource Classification   Tonnes (million)   Phosphate   Nickel     Grade P2O5    Contained P2O5(tonnes)   Grade Nickel   Contained Nickel (Mlbs)     Indicated   0.6   8.4%   50,000   0.2%   3.1     Inferred   8.1   9.4%   800,000   0.2%   42.1   Vanadium Market & OutlookThe vanadium market is predicted to slip into deficit later this year, with demand outstripping supply for the foreseeable future (Figure 2).  Prices have reacted by rising sharply after almost a decade of decline (Figure 3). Over 90% of current vanadium demand is from the steel industry, and is growing at a steady rate of 3%-4% per year.   Demand is driven by vanadium-steel having one of the highest strength to weight ratios of any steel alloy.  Adding only 2 pounds of vanadium to a tonne of steel doubles its strength, and rebar made from vanadium steel alloy is a key component to improving the resistance of buildings to earthquakes.Demand for vanadium from the battery industry is starting to grow exponentially; batteries are expected to make up 25% of vanadium demand in 2020 from 6% in 2016 (Figure 2). Technical InformationDr. Richard Spencer, P.Geo., C.Geol., President and CEO of U3O8 Corp. and a Qualified Person as defined by National Instrument 43-101, has approved the technical information in this news release relating to the Laguna Salada Deposit and the related PEA.About U3O8 Corp.U3O8 Corp. is focused on exploration and development of deposits of uranium and associated commodities in South America.  Potential by-products from uranium production include commodities used in the energy storage industry – in the manufacture of batteries - such as nickel, vanadium and phosphate.  The Company's mineral resources estimates were made in accordance with National Instrument 43-101, and are contained in three deposits: Laguna Salada Deposit, Argentina – a PEA shows this near surface, free-digging uranium - vanadium deposit has low production-cost potential;Berlin Deposit, Colombia – a PEA shows that Berlin also has low-cost uranium production potential due to revenue that would be generated from by-products of phosphate, vanadium, nickel, rare earths (yttrium and neodymium) and other metals that occur within the deposit; andKurupung Deposit, Guyana – a uranium resource has been estimated in four veins within a uranium-zirconium vein system. Resources have been estimated on four veins, while consistent mineralization of the same type has been intersected in scout drilling of an additional six veins, while yet other veins require first-time exploration drilling.Information on U3O8 Corp., its resources and technical reports are available at www.u3o8corp.com and on SEDAR at www.sedar.com.  Follow U3O8 Corp. on Facebook:  www.facebook.com/u3o8corp, Twitter:  www.twitter.com/u3o8corp and Youtube: www.youtube.com/u3o8corp.Forward-Looking StatementsThis news release includes certain "forward looking statements" related with the development plans, economic potential and growth targets of U3O8 Corp's projects. Forward-looking statements consist of statements that are not purely historical, including statements regarding beliefs, plans, expectations or intensions for the future, and include, but not limited to, statements with respect to: (a) the low-cost and near-term development of Laguna Salada, (b) the Laguna Salada and Berlin PEAs, (c) the potential of the Kurupung district in Guyana, (d) impact of the U- pgradeTM process on expected capital and operating expenditures, and (e) the price and market for uranium. These statements are based on assumptions, including that: (i) actual results of our exploration, resource goals, metallurgical testing, economic studies and development activities will continue to be positive and proceed as planned, and assumptions in the Laguna Salada and Berlin PEAs prove to be accurate, (ii) a joint venture will be formed with the provincial petroleum and mining company on the Argentina project, (iii) requisite regulatory and governmental approvals will be received on a timely basis on terms acceptable to U3O8 Corp., (iv) economic, political and industry market conditions will be favourable, and (v) financial markets and the market for uranium will improve for junior resource companies in the short-term. Such statements are subject to risks and uncertainties that may cause actual results, performance or developments to differ materially from those contained in such statements, including, but not limited to: (1) changes in general economic and financial market conditions, (2) changes in demand and prices for minerals, (3) the Company's ability to establish appropriate joint venture partnerships, (4) litigation, regulatory, and legislative developments, dependence on regulatory approvals, and changes in environmental compliance requirements, community support and the political and economic climate, (5) the inherent uncertainties and speculative nature associated with exploration results, resource estimates, potential resource growth, future metallurgical test results, changes in project parameters as plans evolve, (6) competitive developments, (7) availability of future financing, (8) exploration risks, and other factors beyond the control of U3O8 Corp. including those factors set out in the "Risk Factors" in our Annual Information Form available on SEDAR at www.sedar.com. Readers are cautioned that the assumptions used in the preparation of such information, although considered reasonable at the time of preparation, may prove to be imprecise and, as such, undue reliance should not be placed on forward-looking statements. U3O8 Corp. assumes no obligation to update such information, except as may be required by law. For more information on the above-noted PEAs, refer to the September 18, 2014 technical report titled "Preliminary Economic Assessment of the Laguna Salada Uranium-Vanadium Deposit, Chubut Province, Argentina" and the January 18, 2013 technical report titled "U3O8 Corp. Preliminary Economic Assessment on the Berlin Deposit, Colombia."___________________________________ 1 September 18, 2014 Technical Report:  "Preliminary Economic Assessment of the Laguna Salada Uranium Vanadium Deposit, Chubut Province, Argentina.2 January 18, 2013 technical report:  "Berlin Project, Colombia – Preliminary Economic Assessment, NI 43-101 Report."3 May 20, 2011:  "Laguna Salada Project, Chubut Province, Argentina, NI 43-101 Technical Report on Laguna Salada:  Initial Resource Estimate".    4 March 2, 2012:  "Berlin Project, Colombia – National Instrument NI 43-101 Report".ReblogShareTweetShareRecently ViewedYour list is empty.What to Read NextElectric-car battery progress: incremental improvements, not revolutionary leapsGreen Car ReportsEngineer Finds Pattern; Makes Millions in StocksMoney MorningSponsoredHitler exhibition in Berlin bunker asks: How could it happen?ReutersBerlin orders recall of 22,000 Porsches over emissions cheatingAFPThe 'two pizza rule' is a secret to productive meetings that helped Amazon CEO Jeff Bezos become one of the world's richest menBusiness InsiderDiscover it: 4.8 out of 5 avg. by 24K+ customersDiscover CardSponsoredHere are the US targets North Korea most likely wants to nukeBusiness InsiderTrump to cops: 'Please don't be too nice' while arresting 'thugs,' and don't worry about their heads when you toss them in the 'paddy wagon'Business InsiderOil takes a breather after rallying to 8-week highsInvesting.comTrunk Club. Making Sense of Style.Trunk ClubSponsoredChevron and Exxon Mobil have a tough path ahead: NYSE traderYahoo Finance VideoStocks mixed after heavy earnings weekWells Fargo faces angry questions after new sales abuses uncoveredReutersWhich Travel Card Has the Most Valuable Miles?Wise BreadSponsoredAPNewsBreak: Yellowstone park cracks down on sex harassmentAssociated PressThe real reason overseas manufacturing is coming to AmericaYahoo FinancePutin critic says Russian lawyer's Trump Tower meeting was about sanctionsGreg: A lawyer, a spy, a mob boss, and a money launder walk into a bar. The bartender says: "you guys must be here to talk about adoption."Join the Conversation1 / 5801















Argentina – U3O8 Corp

























































Loading stock data... 


FacebookTwitterYoutubeLinkedin 







ArgentinaProximity to Argentina’s largest known uranium deposits.


U3O8 Corp. has an extensive land position adjacent to Argentina’s largest known uranium deposits (the Cerro Solo deposit in Chubut province with a historic resource of 10 million pounds at 0.15% U3O8 and the Sierra Pintada deposit in Mendoza Province with a historic resource of 30 million pounds at 0.12% U3O8) presently owned and under development by the National Atomic Energy Commission of Argentina (CNEA). The CNEA has identified these two areas – the Cretaceous San Jorge Basin of Chubut Province and the Sierra Pintada Uranium District in Mendoza Province – as having the country’s best uranium discovery potential.


U3O8 Corp’s most advanced properties in Argentina are in Chubut Province, and contain both surficial uranium and sandstone-hosted uranium targets. Other properties in Chubut, Mendoza, Salta, Catamarca, San Luis and Santa Cruz provinces constitute grassroots prospects, which are being evaluated and prioritized for further exploration.

Surficial uranium – Laguna Salada is the first project in Argentina to add to our mineral resource inventory. The Laguna Salada Project hosts surficial uranium-vanadium that lies within three metres from surface. Metallurgical test results show rapid uranium-vanadium extraction using alkaline leaching in the Guanaco area of the deposit, while acid leach was very effective in the Lago Seco area.

Sandstone-hosted uranium – The Cerro Solo Area target lies adjacent to the State-owned Cerro Solo uranium deposit. Scout drilling has intersected significant sandstone-hosted uranium of 1-2 metres at 0.1-0.2% U3O8 in two bore holes. Target areas will be refined through IP geophysical surveys and further drilling.

121Alberto

   

News Sign-Up 


Thanks for signing up!


Join U3O8 Corp's mailing list to have the latest news and updates delivered straight to your inbox.






Email Address 
Sign Up
By submitting this form, you are granting: U3O8 Corp, 8 King Street East, Toronto, Ontario, M5C1B5, Canada,  permission to email you. You may unsubscribe via the link found at the bottom of every email.  (See our Email Privacy Policy for details.) Emails are serviced by Constant Contact.






Latest Press ReleasesU3O8 Corp.  Announces Terms of Financing Available to its Existing ShareholdersJune 27, 2017 - 9:00 amU3O8 Corp. Announces Results of Shareholder Meeting and Warrant CancellationJune 23, 2017 - 9:00 amU3O8 Corp. Reports Progress on Capital Restructuring / Director Warrant ExerciseJune 6, 2017 - 3:16 pmU3O8 Corp. Announces that David Marsh, a Metallurgist with Extensive Experience in the Design, Construction and Operation of Uranium Extraction Plants, is to Stand for Election as a DirectorMay 25, 2017 - 9:05 amFacebookTwitter 

























Scroll to top










Management – U3O8 Corp

























































Loading stock data... 


FacebookTwitterYoutubeLinkedin 







ManagementExploration Leadership.


U3O8 Corp’s seasoned management team is committed to bringing vision, extensive know-how and our proven track records in global exploration, resource development, finance and business to execute your company’s exploration strategy and growth plans.


Dr. Richard Spencer, BSc(Hons), PhD, CGeol, PGeoDirector, President and CEO- Target generation & exploration of the giant gold-uranium deposits of the Witwatersrand Basin in South Africa;
- Led the exploration teams that:
    • Discovered the 3.3 million ounce Quimsacocha / Loma Larga gold deposit in Ecuador (also contains 23 million ounces of silver);
    • Increased the gold reserve at the Las Cristinas deposit in Venezuela by 65% from 10.2 million ounces to 16.8 million ounces;
    • Discovered a belt of porphyry copper deposits in Ecuador.  Resources are: 23 billion pounds of copper & 4 million ounces of gold in the Mirador, Panantza & San Carlos deposits.
U3O8 Corp
Mr. John Ross, CPA, CADirector, CFO- Formerly CFO at IAMGOLD, which had exploration teams in South America and Africa, and a producing mine in west Africa, and FNX Mining with mining operations in Ontario;
- Involved in a number of M&A transactions, including IAMGOLD with Repadre and Cronus with Continental Gold;
- With the then CEO of IAMGOLD, introduced the “gold money policy” – converted IAMGOLD’s cash to bullion, resulting in a true gold-focussed company. Other gold companies were still hedging and the Bank of England was selling the last of the country’s gold at the time that IAMGOLD adopted the gold money policy.
U3O8 CorpHugo Bastias, BSc, PhDExecutive VP - Based in Argentina- Over 30 years of exploration experience throughout South America;
- Was instrumental in the discovery of the 7.5 million ounce Veladero gold deposit – now a Barrick mine in Argentina;
- Was instrumental in U3O8 Corp.’s uranium discoveries in Colombia & Argentina;
- Extensive experience in social initiatives and environmental  stewardship.
U3O8 CorpElpidio Reis, BSc, MSc, MBAChief Operating Officer - based in Brazil- Retired director of Rio Tinto (Brazil) and three of its subsidiaries that operated four mines in Brazil;
- Fourteen years global exploration and development roles in Shell and Billiton before it merged into BHP Billiton;
- He has taken several projects using both open pit and underground mining methods, from exploration, through feasibility study to production, including Fortaleza de Minas Ni-Co-PGM, MCR high quality lump iron ore and Copelmi Steam Coal;
- Led a team that undertook due diligence studies of  Vale’s Carajás  iron and copper-gold deposits, as well as increasing resources of the Salobo copper-gold deposit in the 1990s;
- Instrumental on the discovery and  development of the 19million ounce  Morro do Ouro mine in Brazil – developing processing techniques for the processing of very low-grade ore.
U3O8 CorpGabriel Bastias, BSc, MScVP Exploration - based in Argentina- Led the team that discovered U3O8 Corp.’s Laguna Salada uranium-vanadium deposit in Argentina along with other discoveries that have yet to be advanced to resource definition.
- Over 14 years’ experience in exploration having advanced grass roots discoveries to feasibility stage projects.  Gabriel provides in-house resource and reserve estimation expertise. 
- Completed MSc in Mineral Exploration at Queens University, Ontario, with a thesis on uranium exploration methods under the direction of Prof. Kurt Keyser.
U3O8 Corp
   

News Sign-Up 


Thanks for signing up!


Join U3O8 Corp's mailing list to have the latest news and updates delivered straight to your inbox.






Email Address 
Sign Up
By submitting this form, you are granting: U3O8 Corp, 8 King Street East, Toronto, Ontario, M5C1B5, Canada,  permission to email you. You may unsubscribe via the link found at the bottom of every email.  (See our Email Privacy Policy for details.) Emails are serviced by Constant Contact.






Latest Press ReleasesU3O8 Corp.  Announces Terms of Financing Available to its Existing ShareholdersJune 27, 2017 - 9:00 amU3O8 Corp. Announces Results of Shareholder Meeting and Warrant CancellationJune 23, 2017 - 9:00 amU3O8 Corp. Reports Progress on Capital Restructuring / Director Warrant ExerciseJune 6, 2017 - 3:16 pmU3O8 Corp. Announces that David Marsh, a Metallurgist with Extensive Experience in the Design, Construction and Operation of Uranium Extraction Plants, is to Stand for Election as a DirectorMay 25, 2017 - 9:05 amFacebookTwitter 

























Scroll to top










Energy Storage – U3O8 Corp

























































Loading stock data... 


FacebookTwitterYoutubeLinkedin 







Energy StorageEnergy storage is the single biggest challenge and opportunity for widespread adoption of renewable energy.


U3O8 Corp. would produce a basket of “battery commodities” for lithium-ion and vanadium redox flow batteries.


Goldman Sachs has stated that “lithium is the new gasoline”, but one could argue that a truer statement is that electricity is the next gasoline, and our challenge is to find efficient and cost-effective ways of storing electricity so that it’s available on demand. Battery prices have been declining steadily, but need to fall further before electricity storage can become competitive and start to displace fossil fuels. As a company with “battery commodities” we have an opportunity to contribute to the deeper penetration of batteries into the energy market.
Lithium-ion batteries (LIB) have been so widely adopted because they store a relatively large amount of power for their size and weight (they have a high energy density); they have a high power output, but for a short duration. LIBs are complimented by longer-duration, lower power output batteries like the vanadium redox flow battery (VRFB) that are capable of storing energy on a large scale. LIBs and VRFBs can be visualized as the fast and strong versus the slow and steady. Many other types of battery are under investigation – this is a field that is evolving at a very quick pace.


Lithium Ion Batteries (LIB)
Power delivered from a LIB results from the flow of lithium ions from the negative anode to the positive cathode. Recharging reverses this flow and “restocks” the anode with lithium ions that have migrated back from the cathode. Graphite is the anode in most LIBs, while various designs use different compounds for the cathode. Early LIBs used cobalt in the cathode, but this resulted in the batteries overheating and being relatively unstable. More recent designs include phosphate compounds such as iron phosphate or vanadium phosphate with a mixture of nickel, cobalt, manganese and/or aluminium. U3O8 Corp.’s Berlin deposit in Colombia would produce many of the cathode commodities including phosphate, nickel and vanadium, while manganese and iron that are introduced in the extraction process could be recovered to augment the package of battery commodities available from Berlin.




Vanadium Redox Flow Batteries (VRFB)
Vanadium would be produced from both the Laguna Salada and Berlin deposits. VRFBs make use of the characteristic that vanadium occurs in four charge states – and the batteries work by having V2+ and V3+ constituting the negative anode and V4+ and V5+ together on the positive cathode side of the battery. When liquids from the two sides of the battery come in contact with a metal plate, electrical current is generated. The industrial storage potential of VRFBs is based on the fact that their capacity depends basically on the size of the plastic tanks that store the two vanadium solutions: bigger tanks mean greater storage capacity. VRFBs can be charged and discharged very quickly – almost instantaneously. Since there is no chemical reaction between elements on either side of the battery, VRFBs do not degrade and lose capacity over time as LIBs do.
LIBs are good for power required over short time-frames of a few hours, whereas VRFBs are more suited to longer-duration power delivery up to 12 hours and more.


 About
Corporate
What is Uranium?
Why South America?
Investors
News
Projects
Contact
  

News Sign-Up 


Thanks for signing up!


Join U3O8 Corp's mailing list to have the latest news and updates delivered straight to your inbox.






Email Address 
Sign Up
By submitting this form, you are granting: U3O8 Corp, 8 King Street East, Toronto, Ontario, M5C1B5, Canada,  permission to email you. You may unsubscribe via the link found at the bottom of every email.  (See our Email Privacy Policy for details.) Emails are serviced by Constant Contact.






Latest Press ReleasesU3O8 Corp.  Announces Terms of Financing Available to its Existing ShareholdersJune 27, 2017 - 9:00 amU3O8 Corp. Announces Results of Shareholder Meeting and Warrant CancellationJune 23, 2017 - 9:00 amU3O8 Corp. Reports Progress on Capital Restructuring / Director Warrant ExerciseJune 6, 2017 - 3:16 pmU3O8 Corp. Announces that David Marsh, a Metallurgist with Extensive Experience in the Design, Construction and Operation of Uranium Extraction Plants, is to Stand for Election as a DirectorMay 25, 2017 - 9:05 amFacebookTwitter 

























Scroll to top



